https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Kirill_Vladimirovich,_Grand_Duke_of_Russia


Ludendorff, Kurlov, Aufbau wanted this guy to be Tsar of Russia

	Kirill found his strongest support among a group of legitimists known as the Mladorossi, a Russian emigre monarchist organization that ultimately became heavily influenced by fascism – although it distanced itself from other fascist movements.[citation needed] The organization began to exhibit pro-Soviet sympathies, arguing that the monarchy and the Soviet Bolshevik system could peacefully coexist (their slogan being "Tsar and the Soviets", a socialist version of the traditional "Tsar and People" ). Kirill became more wary of the organization when he learned that its founder, Alexander Kazem-Bek, was spotted meeting with an OGPU agent. Kirill accepted Kazem-Bek's voluntary resignation.


what's going on here


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Mladorossi
	The founder of the Mladorossi, Alexander Kazembek, was implicated of having ties with the Soviet consulate and OGPU. In 1937, after being spotted in a cafe in France speaking to several Soviet diplomats, Kazembek resigned his post. 



Kirill getting support from fascists with Russian intel ties




from Kellog book:

	Afteritconsolidateditselfintoapowerfulconspiratorialforceinthefirs
halfof1921underScheubner-Richter’sdefactoleadership,Aufbautriedand
failed to unite all White émigrés behind Grand Prince Kirill Romanov in
league with National Socialists. Aufbau hoped to lead all White émigrés in
Europe in an anti-Bolshevik crusade that would replace Soviet rule with
nationalist Russian, Ukrainian, and Baltic states. Instead of unifying all
White émigrés, Aufbau engaged in bitter internecine struggle with the
Supreme Monarchical Council under the former Union of the Russian
People faction leader Nikolai Markov II. The Council supported Grand
Prince Nikolai Nikolaevich Romanov, who had close ties to the French
government, for Tsar. Markov II’s Council sought to reestablish Imperial
RussiainitsformerborderswithFrenchmilitaryassistance.Aufbaudetested
the Council’s pro-French undertakings to such a degree that it entertained
a hazardous tactical alliance with the Red Army.


Some, including Aufbau support Kirill, others support Markov II, they fight each other bitterly.

	...As we shall see, Aufbau increasingly backed Kirill
for Tsar.


	...To further complementary right-wing German and Russian interests,
Hitler assisted the pro-Kirill Aufbau in its struggle with Markov II’s
Supreme Monarchical Council. For its support, Kirill granted Hitler’s
National Socialist Party considerable subsidies in the context of the
“German–Russian national cause.” While Aufbau could not unite all
White émigrés in Germany (and beyond) behind Kirill and in harness
with National Socialists, the Aufbau ideologues Scheubner-Richter, Vin-
berg, and Rosenberg called for “Germany–Russia above everything.” They
succeeded in convincing Hitler of the need for a nationalist German–
Russian alliance against the Entente, the Weimar Republic, the Soviet
Union, and international Jewry.

	...In addition to scheming to overthrow the Soviet Union in league with
National Socialists, Aufbau played a pivotal role in coordinating Hitler’s
preparations for a putsch aganst the Weimar Republic. Aufbau helped the
National Socialist Party to build a substantial war chest for its intended
coup by contributing funds from Aufbau members or allies such as Kirill
as well as by channeling funds from Henry Ford, the wealthy American
industrialist and politician.


For this they got funding, support from Kirill, including for Hitler.

iirc a lot of ties between Russian nobility and germany? Willhelm was Nicholas' cousin


...InthecontextofRenewal,Scheubner-Richtergainedavaluableconnec-
tion with Grand Prince Kirill Romanov, a claimant to the Tsarist throne,
for Aufbau. Kirill displayed marked pro-German sympathies. His mother
wastheDuchessofMecklenburg,andhehadgrownupinconstantcontact
with German teachers and relatives. 135 His wife, Grand Princess Viktoria
Romanov,wasthedaughterofDukeAlfredofSaxe-Coburgandthegrand-
daughter of Queen Victoria of England. 136 Viktoria was a strong-willed
and energetic woman who overshadowed her somewhat staid husband. 137
Scheubner-Richter arranged for her to serve as Renewal’s honorary presi-
dent. 138 Renewal’s parent organization Aufbau increasingly benefited from
financial assistance and prestige emanating from its association with the
Russian throne claimants Kirill and Viktoria. In return, Aufbau supported
Kirill’s bid to become Tsar.


right so this deal helps them get funding, also maybe helps divide Whites


	...In an increasingly acrimonious power struggle, Aufbau and Nikolai
Markov II’s Supreme Monarchical Council, which had been established
at the Bad Reichenhall Congress, offered divergent visions of how to over-
throw Bolshevism in the course of 1921–1923. Aufbau fostered National
Socialist–WhiteémigrécollaborationtoplaceGrandPrinceKirillRomanov
at the head of a Russian monarchy that would be allied with autonomous
Ukrainian and Baltic states. Markov II’s Council opposed Aufbau’s pro-
German designs for reorganizing the East. Despite operating from Berlin,
theCouncilincreasinglyvehementlybackedtheTsaristcandidacyofGrand
Prince Nikolai Nikolaevich Romanov, Kirill’s cousin, who lived in Paris
and had close ties with the French government.


I wonder of the Paris Okhrana backed Markov? General Kurlov's intel agency reminds me of them, like their german counterpart. But the Kirill-Markov rivalry does come-off as a way to split the Whites. You'd think the Whites would hate Germany though, given the earlier German support for the Bolsheviks.


	...No White émigré-backed invasion of the Soviet Union materialized in
theearly1920s,largelybecauseofthejealousrivalriesamongWhiteémigrés
in Germany and Europe as a whole. In the end, Aufbau’s increasingly
bitter struggle against Markov II’s Supreme Monarchical Council sapped
the energy of Germany’s White émigré community. Aufbau even contem-
plated a hazardous tactical alliance with the Red Army to thwart French-
led designs to invade the Soviet Union with the support of White émigrés
who backed Nikolai Nikolaevich for Tsar. This desperate contingency plan
demonstrated the fragile nature of the apparent White unity that had been
established in 1921 at the Monarchical Congress at Bad Reichenhall. White
émigré discord provided a valuable respite to the still unstable Bolshevik
regime.

...Aufbau proved less successful in combining all White émigrés in Germany
(and beyond) under its aegis than in convincing Hitler of the need for
German-Russian collaboration against international Jewry. While it never
tiredoftrying,AufbaucouldnotuniteallofEurope’sWhite émigrésunder
its banner. Despite early cooperation, as witnessed at the May–June 1921
MonarchicalCongressatBadReichenhall,AufbauandNikolaiMarkovII’s
Union of the Faithful drifted further and further apart. Both factions grew
increasingly vindictive, and Aufbau even contemplated a perilous tactical
alliance with the Red Army to oppose Markov II’s pro-French designs to
invade Bolshevik Russia. White émigrés in 1921–1923 offered a powerful
example of the disastrous consequences of engaging in infighting instead
of uniting for a common cause.


Right, helped divide the Whites


	...Hitler’s National Socialist Party came down clearly on Aufbau’s side
in internecine White émigré struggle. Hitler allied himself with Kirill’s
candidacy for the Tsarist throne in return for Kirill’s considerable financial
support of the NSDAP. The key Aufbau ideologues Max von Scheubner-
Richter, Alfred Rosenberg, Fedor Vinberg, and their völkisch colleague
Dietrich Eckart, Hitler’s early mentor, provided a theoretical basis for
National Socialist–White émigré collaboration against Bolshevism and
Jewry in league with Kirill. They emphasized the complementary nature of
the Germans and Russians, generally not differentiating between Russians
and Ukrainians. They further argued that Jewry consistently undermined
theGermanandRussianpeoples.Inhisearlypoliticalcareer,Hitlerrepeat-
edly urged nationalist Germans and Russians to cooperate to overthrow
what he perceived as “Jewish Bolshevism.”


Kirill backed Hitler, and maybe for some of the Whites (who they handed copies of the protocols) they shifted blame for the Bolsheviks from Germany to some sort of international Jewish conspiracy.

I wonder if Hitler thought that his White Emigre buddies in Russia would help overthrow them with subversion? could explain initial reluctance to invade Russia.


	...In the early 1920s, the Aufbau ideologues Rosenberg, Scheubner-Richter,
and Vinberg convinced Hitler’s mentor Eckart and Hitler himself that
nationalistGermansandRussiansneededtocooperatetoovercomealleged
Jewish preponderance in the world. They presented a view of history in
which Imperial Germany and the Russian Empire should never have gone
to war against each other, but rather should have allied with each other
against Britain and France. They argued that insidious Jewish conspirators
had pitted the two powerful empires against each other in order to weaken
them both, thereby setting the stage for an international Jewish dictator-
ship.Aufbau’sviewsofthecomplementaryanti-Bolshevikandanti-Semitic
interests of nationalist Germans and Russians (in the broad sense of the
term) engendered a surprisingly pro-Russian attitude in Hitler’s early ide-
ological views.


So Aufbau convinced Hitler "jewish conspirators" were responsible for Russo-German war in order to weaken both, as if both Russia and Germany share a common enemy in Jews


	...Rosenberg strongly advocated German–Russian cooperation against
international Jewry. In a January 1921 article in In Plain German, he pre-
sented a view of history in which Zionist leaders in Imperial Russia had
helpedtooverthrowtheTsar“justatthemomentwhenhethoughtofmak-
ingpeacewithGermany.”RosenbergarguedthatsinisterJewsinleaguewith
Freemasons had sown discord between the German and Russian peoples in
order to have them “bleed each other to death,” thereby clearing the way
for an international “Jewish dictatorship.” Rosenberg believed that pop-
ular knowledge of these Jewish machinations would lead to the creation
of a “German–Russian national (that is, anti-Jewish) united block. At this
moment Jewry with allied Freemasonry will stand powerless opposite us.
This day must and will come.” 5 In the spirit of Aufbau, Rosenberg envi-
sioned nationalist German–Russian might overcoming the twin evils of
Jewry and Freemasonry.


So Rosenberg told Hitler to team up with Russia against "international Jewry and Freemasonry"


	...Borrowing from Rosenberg, his highly valued collaborator in In Plain
German, Eckart supported nationalist German–Russian cooperation. In a
March 1919 article in In Plain German, “Russian Voices,” which both he
and Rosenberg wrote, Eckart argued, “German politics hardly has another
choice than to enter an alliance with a new Russia after the elimination of
the Bolshevik regime.” 6 In an In Plain German article from February 1920
that warned of the Bolshevik peril, Eckart emphasized: “That Germany
and Russia are dependent upon each other is not open to any doubt.” He
stressed that Germans had to seek connections with the “Russian people”
and not with its “current Jewish regime.” If Germans worked with this
“current Jewish regime” in Russia, then the “lightning inundation of our
native country with the entire Bolshevik chaos” would follow. 7 Eckart thus
distinguishedbetweennefariousJewishBolshevikleadersandtheoppressed
Russian people, the latter of whom were the natural allies of the Germans.


towards a "soft-power" solution to Hitler's percieved problems with the "Jewish Bolshevist" Russian government? kindof taking a page from Ludendorff, who apparently saw soft-power as a way to undermine the Russian army. With his entourage of White-emegre friends, Hitler might have thought this feasible, especially during the Russian civil war.

pg 141 in Kellog book goes on to show how Hitler bought some of this


	...Hitler continued to view Germans and Russians as the primary vic-
tims of international Jewish plotters after 1923. In his unpublished 1928
sequel to Mein Kampf, he expressed a view of history in which insidious
JewishconspiratorshadpittedGermansandRussiansagainsteachother.He
warnedof“theJew’s”drivetodominateEurope.Aspartofthisscheme,the Jew “methodically agitates for world war” with the aim of “the destruction
of inwardly anti-Semitic Russia as well as the destruction of the German
Empire,whichinadministrationandthearmystillofferedresistancetothe
Jew.” Hitler lamented the partial success of “this Jewish battle aim,” noting
that both “Tsarism and Kaiserism in Germany were done away with.” 21
Even in the late 1920s, Hitler upheld the basic Aufbau philosophy that
the Jews concentrated their nefarious actions against two complementary
peoples, the Germans and the Russians.


basically blaming Okhrana activities on Jews


	...In addition to urging German–Russian collaboration, Aufbau engaged
interrorism.BiskupskiiplacedacontractfortheassassinationofAleksandr
Kerenskii, the former head of the 1917 Provisional Government in Russia.
Two Aufbau colleagues, Shabelskii-Bork and Taboritskii, accidentally
shot the prominent Constitutional Democrat Vladimir Nabokov in their
attempttomurdertheRussianConstitutionalDemocraticleaderPavelMil-
iukov.TheAufbauco-conspiratorsBiskupskii,Ludendorff,andhisadvisor
Colonel Karl Bauer (at the least) colluded in the assassination of Weimar
Germany’s Foreign Minister, Walther Rathenau. In this undertaking, the
Aufbau associates conspired with Organization C, a radical right union
based in Munich under the important Kapp Putsch participant Captain
Hermann Ehrhardt. This association carried out terrorist acts, planned
military campaigns against the Weimar Republic and the Soviet Union,
and upheld close relations with Hitler’s National Socialists.


Aufbau doing terrorist things, put a hit on Kerenskii

tie up a loose end?



------

Kellog:

	Hausen received information on Nilus’ personality and on the prove-
nance of the Protocols from an intelligence agency in Berlin under General
Kurlov,whohadearlierservedastheheadoftheImperialRussianOkhrana.
Kurlov had abused his post of Assistant to the Interior Minister in the
Russian Empire by making unauthorized use of secret funds. He had
managed to be expelled from Pavel Skoropadskii’s Hetmanate in the
Ukraine in 1918 before resurfacing in Berlin and establishing his intelli-
gence organization. 96 Citing a “high official” in the former Tsarist Inte-
rior Ministry, almost certainly Kurlov, Hausen claimed that the Protocols
had originally been drafted in Hebrew and then translated into French.
Then the Russian Interior Ministry had received a copy of them and trans-
ferred them to Nilus for translation into Russian and publication. 97 While
false, Hausen’s version of the Protocols’ origins lent the document a certain
allure.


Kurlov, former Okhrana guy, forms intel agency in Berlin, an anonymous source for fake news about the protocols


	...In April 1920, Kommissarov began working for the intelligence agency
that his old protector in the Tsarist Secret Police, General Kurlov, had
recently established in Berlin to provide anti-Bolshevik information to
White émigrés in Germany. Despite the mistrust that he had engendered
amongrightistcirclesinthepast,Kommissarovusedhisconsiderableintel-
lectual gifts and social adroitness to find his way quickly into high society
wherever he went. He began circulating in right-wing monarchical circles
in Munich. He worked especially diligently to gain General Ludendorff’s
favor.


Okhrana/Bolshevik Kommissarov ends up working with Kurlov again, also tries to get close to Ludendorff


	...After Aufbau’s re-founding, the organization strongly supported Kir-
ill’s claim to the Tsarist throne in opposition to Markov II’s increasingly
pro-French Supreme Monarchical Council. In February 1922, the Aufbau
leadersScheubner-Richter,Biskupskii,andLudendorffurgedKirilltomove
from the French Riviera to Bavaria so that he could act in the center of his
German base of support. Kirill and his wife Viktoria discussed this relo-
cation with German officials. 76 Anticipating Kirill’s arrival in Germany,
General Ludendorff worked to establish an intelligence service for Kirill
and his allies under Walther Nicolai in early April 1922. Nicolai had served
Ludendorff as the head of the German Army High Command Intelli-
gence Service during World War I. Ludendorff asked Nicolai to use his
considerable experience and connections to establish a reliable pro-Kirill
intelligence agency for the struggle against Bolshevism. 77 This bureau was
toreplacethemoremodestagencythatGeneralKurlovandLieutenantIurii
Kartsov had earlier established to support the legitimist movement behind
Kirill.


Kurlov, Ludendorff, and Aufbau all working to support Kirill (along with OGPU in other orgs)


	...Nicolai met with Scheubner-Richter and Ludendorff in the middle of
April 1922 to discuss matters in greater detail. He agreed to establish an
anti-BolshevikintelligenceagencysothatLudendorffandhisallies,includ-
ing Scheubner-Richter, Kirill, and Hitler, would have a reliable source of
information on events in the Soviet Union. The money for the intelli-
genceservice,code-namedProjectS,camefromKirill.Nicolaibegansend-
ing regular reports to Scheubner-Richter in the first half of July 1922. 80
Scheubner-Richter expressed satisfaction with Aufbau’s intelligence infor-
mationinanOctober1922editionofAufbauCorrespondence.Henotedthat
agents were sending reports from Vienna, Budapest, the Balkans, Kiev, and
“other” cities in the Soviet Union. 81 In addition to using information from
Project S for Aufbau’s purposes, Scheubner-Richter passed intelligence on
to Hitler’s National Socialist Party, to which he belonged and with which
Aufbau was ever increasingly allied.


Kurlov not in this new intel agency supporting Kirill, but Ludendorf works hard to set up with Kirill funding. End up "informing" Hitler's Nazis.



------

Kellog:


	...InadditiontoservingasaGerman/Whiteanti-Bolshevikcrusadeabroad,
the Latvian Intervention complemented international far right efforts to
overthrow the Weimar Republic. Nationalist Germans grouped around
Wolfgang Kapp and Ludendorff hoped for support for their intended
putsch from rightist German and White members of Bermondt-Avalov’s
Western Volunteer Army after they had triumphed over Bolshevism in
Latvia and Russia. After the defeat of Bermondt-Avalov’s forces, Kapp
and Ludendorff used demobilized Germans and White émigrés from
the Latvian Intervention to undermine the Weimar Republic. National
revolutionary undertakings climaxed with the abortive Kapp Putsch of
March 1920, which Ludendorff, Scheubner-Richter, Biskupskii, Vinberg,
Shabelskii-Bork, Taboritskii, and even Hitler and Eckart supported. While
theKappPutschfailedinBerlin,itsucceededinMunich,anditsetthestage
for increased cooperation between völkisch Germans, including National
Socialists, and White émigrés there.


Ludendorff involved in trying to overthrow Weimar Republic with Aufbau, White-emigre conspirators


	...Aufbau linked important völkisch Germans, most notably Hitler and
General Ludendorff, whom Scheubner-Richter introduced to each other
in the framework of Aufbau, with prominent White émigrés. Important
White émigré members of Aufbau included First Secretary Scheubner-
Richter himself, Vice President Biskupskii, Deputy Director Schickedanz,
Ukrainian faction leader Poltavets-Ostranitsa, Vinberg, Shabelskii-Bork,
Taboritskii,Rosenberg,andRosenberg’scollaboratorinEckart’snewspaper
In Plain German, Kursell. In addition to serving in Aufbau, Scheubner-
Richter, Schickedanz, Kursell, and Rosenberg played active roles in the
National Socialist Party. Aufbau’s second secretary, the German Max
Amann, also served as the National Socialist Party secretary.


Aufbau, Shuebner-Richter linking Ludnedorff and White emigres.


	...Around the time that German forces marched into the Ukraine to
the mixed feelings of Skoropadskii, German military leaders feared and
distrusted the new Soviet regime even while German representatives nego-
tiated with it. As of early March 1918, Walther Nicolai, the head of the
GermanArmyHighCommandIntelligenceServicewhowentontosupply
intelligence to the National Socialist Party, believed that Bolshevism now
represented the true danger to Germany’s Eastern security. He regarded
Lenin as a threat to emerge as the “Napoleon of this epoch” who would
endanger the power of the established elites in Germany and beyond. Gen-
eral Ludendorff agreed with Nicolai.


weird--Ludendorff agreed Lenin, Bolshevism a threat, while at the same time Ludendorff secured Lenin's passage to Russia and germans were funding Bolsheviks. Some in German government saying supporting Lenin of great importance to their interests.


	...In a June 1918 situation report, General Ludendorff expressed strong
anti-Bolshevik and pro-White views. He stressed that he utterly distrusted
“dishonest” Soviet machinations. He argued: “We cannot expect anything
from this Soviet government although it only lives through our mercy. It
is a perpetual danger for us.” He emphasized that while the German gov-
ernment could officially only deal with the Bolshevik regime, it should
nonetheless “establish contact with rightist, more monarchical groups in
somewayandinfluencethemsothatthemonarchicalmovementwillmarch in full accordance with our wishes when it has established its position.” 29
Members of the Ukrainian Volunteer Army gave good grounds for Luden-
dorff’s optimistic expectations of them. They thanked the Germans for
saving their property from Bolshevik confiscation and for protecting their
lives.


Ludendorff decides Bolsheviks can't be trusted, even though they support them, and says they should gain influence with White forces.



from Taylor book:
	...The Soviet Embassy soon became a headquarters for the Independent Socialists and other revolutionaries who later formed Germany’s first Communist Party. The group’s clandestine “Letters of Spartacus” had spread anti-war propaganda ever since 1916. The circulation of these tracts now increased considerably,

	...The amount of curiously shaped baggage traveling as “diplomatic pouch” from Moscow to Berlin worried the German government, which knew that both subversive pamphlets and arms were being distributed to the left-wing extremists by 7 Unter den Linden. Joffe scarcely bothered to hide his role as agitator; he himself later wrote, “It is necessary to emphasize most categorically that in the preparation of the German revolution, the Russian Embassy worked all the time in close contact with the German Socialists.”

	Ludendorff and Hoffmann had voiced misgivings from the first over introducing the Bolshevik Trojan horse into the German capital Eventually even the Wilhelmstrasse, and the Imperial Chancellery, along with the moderate Socialists, came around to the view that it was a mistake to let the Bolsheviks have a diplomatic mission in Germany before a general peace was signed. Hampered by diplomatic usage from collecting the evidence that would have justified a rupture, the German authorities finally hit on an ingenious but desperate expedient: the police planted a package of faked and flagrantly subversive propaganda tracts in the Russian “pouch” and arranged to have it dropped in the railway station so that it burst open.


	...The prisoners of war who started streaming back into Germany from Russia after the treaty of Brest-Litovsk also helped to spread the virus of revolutionary defeatism; some of them had been systematically indoctrinated with Bolshevik propaganda, but many more had been brainwashed by the ordeal of captivity itself, or had been spontaneously won over by the delivery of revolution. Their influence both on the civilian population and on the exhausted troops fighting off the final Allied onslaughts in the West was disastrous. Under the spell of such slogans as “Peace and Bread,” whole units gave themselves up to the Allies without resistance in August 1918 and retreating troops jeeringly called reservists coming up to relieve them “strikebreakers.”


Bolsheviks pulling same shit in Germany after Brest-Litovsk, and some before too


so Luendorff, German command had plenty of reasons to distrust Bolsheviks

Was Ludendorff not blamed for supporting Bolsheviks and Lenin? could see Brest-Litovsk as a decisive "victory" with drawbacks, I guess

Did they go from supporting Bolsheviks during the war to supporting the White during the Russian civil war?


	...Other Whites left the Ukraine for Germany in the summer of 1918.
General Biskupskii of the Ukrainian Volunteer Army journeyed to Berlin
to demonstrate his fidelity to Germany. 53 Hetman Skoropadskii arrived in
Berlin in early September 1918. The Kaiser assured him that he wished
an independent Ukraine. Skoropadskii then met with General Ludendorff
at the Army High Command Headquarters in Spa, Belgium. Ludendorff
suggested coordinating the Ukrainian Volunteer Army with the Southern
Army and Krasnov’s Don Cossacks to attack the Bolsheviks. He promised
to release Russian prisoners of war to serve in the Ukrainian Volun-
teer and Southern Armies. He urged this combined anti-Bolshevik force
to attack from the south while the German Army marched against
the Bolsheviks from the west. 54 With Imperial Germany’s deteriorating
military position on the Western Front and in the Balkans, however,
this strategy of coordinated anti-Bolshevik action ultimately had to be
abandoned.


Ludendorff wanted to declare war on the Bolsheviks? had his own White force in Ukraine, but also wanted to use German Army.

Presumably, at this point Lenin would also not want to be seen as a German spy. One guess, would they have wanted Lenin to lead a crushing campaign against the Germans?

Another guess: such a plan would make Ludendorff look less like he's in league with the Bolsheviks.

seems like the plan was dumb with Americans on the Western front.


	...The German Political Section considered Scheubner-Richter to be an
appropriate choice for such important strategic responsibilities because of
his upbringing in the Russian Empire along with his studies to become a
lecturer in Russian history. Scheubner-Richter had also gathered valuable
wartime experience in Eastern matters. He had served as the German vice
consul in the Ottoman Empire with the mission of fostering Caucasian
and Ukrainian independence movements within the Russian Empire. He
had also unsuccessfully pressured the Ottoman government to stop its
wartime massacre of Christian Armenians. The Political Section of the
Army Chief of Staff had sent him to Stockholm in July 1917, where he had
used the haven of neutral territory to initiate contacts with various anti-
Bolshevik groups in Russia, most notably with Ukrainians and Georgians. 3
Scheubner-Richter had come to the attention of General Ludendorff, the
chief of the Army General Staff, through his daring and initiative. He had
subsequently enjoyed the general’s patronage


Ludendorff tight with Sheubner-Richter, Richter also involved in Armenian genocide?


also shows one way how the Russian civil war, "proxy war" in Russia helped Okhrana spies spread around world.


familiar pattern of white emigre being recruited and then acting against the interests of his employers



	...WiththeBolshevikseizureofpowerinearlyNovember1917,Scheubner-
Richter worried that the Baltic Germans still under Bolshevik rule must
have it the worst in Bolshevik Russia. He tirelessly planned the German
advanceintoLivoniaandEstonia. 5 HiscommandingofficerinRiga,Major
General Buchfink, found Scheubner-Richter to possess great intelligence,
courage, and initiative. Buchfink later stressed that his operations in the
Baltic region would not have been possible without Scheubner-Richter’s
knowledge of Russian and Baltic conditions. Buchfink further stressed that
Scheubner-RichterwaswellknownandappreciatedintheGermanOfficer
Corps and was one of the most beloved figures in Riga society. 

	Scheubner-Richter’s efforts to bring the Baltic region under German
control succeeded initially, but he soon experienced frustration. Imperial
German troops captured Reval, Estonia’s principal city, in late February
1918. 7 Scheubner-Richter earned the Iron Cross, First Class, for his contri-
butions to the German advance into Livonia and Estonia. Aware that the
fledgling Bolshevik regime could not offer serious military resistance, he
pressedforGermanforcestoadvanceonPetrograd,thentheSovietcapital,
to overthrow the Bolshevik regime and to establish a nationalist Russian
government friendly to Imperial Germany. The German negotiations with
Bolshevik representatives in Brest-Litovsk precluded this course of action,
however. Rebuffed in his efforts to convince the German Army High
Command to capture Petrograd, the most Scheubner-Richter could do to
undermine Bolshevik rule in early 1918 was to establish an anti-Bolshevik
secret service that extracted information from sources within Bolshevik
Russia. 


So Richter responsible in part for the Push to Riga and Petrograd that led up to Brest-Litovsk.

Richter also founds an "anti-Bolshevik" intel agency



	...While Goltz placed dependable soldiers from the Baltic Intervention in
safe locations throughout East Elbian Prussia so that they could be used
in a putsch against the Weimar Republic, General Ludendorff intensified
his preparations to establish a right-wing dictatorship in which he would
play a leading role. Weimar Germany’s secret political police later asserted
that Ludendorff had been the “father of the Kapp Putsch.” 121 As well as
counting upon interned White soldiers, Ludendorff upheld relations with
Whites inside the former Russian Empire itself. In particular, he kept in
contact with the Narodno-gosudarstvennaia Partiia (People’s State Party),
a successor organization to Vladimir Purishkevich’s Black Hundred associ-
ation, Michael the Archangel Russian People’s Union.

	...While the conspiratorial clique around Kapp and General Ludendorff
hoped for White assistance to overthrow the Weimar Republic


Ludendorff masterminding Kapp coup, drawing on help from sketchy Russian organizations related to Black Hundreds as well as White emigres in General


trying to overthrow the German government with the help of sketchy Russian intel guys seems to be a theme for them

with Hitler, I guess they did exactly that


	...KappseizedpoliticalcontrolinBerlin.HeusedthespecterofBolshevism
tojustifyhisputsch.Heissuedaproclamation,“TotheGermanPeople!”in
which he stressed that the Weimar Republic had proved unable to fend off
thethreatof“devastationandmurderthroughbelligerentBolshevism.”He
stressed that Germany faced “external and internal collapse” and therefore
needed a “strong state authority.” 137 He established a militaristic regime
in which General Ludendorff, Colonel Bauer, and Captain Pabst played
importantroles. 138 Kappfacedaseriousweakness,however,inthathelacked
broad popular backing for his undertaking. 


Kapp Putsch also had some limited early success


http://alphahistory.com/weimarrepublic/kapp-putsch/


ultimately, Putsch seems to have radicalized, divided communist left and fascist right


	Five days after it had begun, Kapp and von Luttwitz’s attempted coup fizzled and both men fled Berlin. Ironically, the Kapp putsch almost triggered the communist revolution it was fomented to prevent. The mobilisation of KPD, USPD and radical union groups in response to the putsch led to several communist insurrections around Germany. Red Army units took control of several cities in the Ruhr region, only to be suppressed by the Freikorps and Reichswehr within three weeks. The SPD government was exposed as tenuous, fragile and easy prey for revolutionaries. The Reichswehr, which should have come to the government’s assistance, had failed to do so and left the government to its own fate. The Freikorps, a group the civilian government had encouraged and relied on January 1919, seemed to have turned against it. The realities of power and influence in the republic had been painfully exposed.


like exporting the Russian civil war to Germany


Kellog:

	...In Berlin, Eckart soon despaired of Kapp’s chances of leading a success-
ful national revolution. Kapp did not imprison Jews as Eckart had recom-
mended. Instead, he merely confiscated flour for matzos. This insufficient
action subsequently led Eckart to comment in In Plain German: “One
does not provoke wild animals, one locks them up.


wtf


same deal as Andropov

going after their matzos


	...According to a report that Kapp’s pupil Hitler wrote, when he had met
with Kapp’s press chief on March 17, 1920, he had realized, “This could
not be a national revolution” and that the Kapp Putsch would fail, “for
the press chief was a Jew.” 145 Hitler referred to Ignatz Trebitsch-Lincoln, an
adventurer born to Jewish parents in Hungary who had left for Canada at
the age of twenty and converted to Christianity, adding the name Lincoln
to his original name Trebitsch. After a three-year prison term in England
for falsifying documents, he had traveled to Berlin in 1919 and had begun
collaborating with Kapp’s colleague Colonel Bauer to coordinate a putsch
against the Weimar Republic. Trebitsch-Lincoln emerged from behind the
scenesinMarch1920toserveasKapp’spresschief. 146 AftertheKappPutsch
failed,hefledtoBudapestandpassedinformationaboutmonarchicalactiv-
ities in Germany to French intelligence. 


Hitler, Kap's pupil, being taught that the reason the Pusht failed was jews


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ignaz_Trebitsch-Lincoln

this guy was sketchy


	...Other White émigrés supported the Kapp Putsch. First Lieutenant
Scheubner-Richter appeared in Berlin to assist Kapp’s cause. Because of his
opensupportoftheKappPutsch,hewassubsequentlyforcedtogiveuphis
position as the secretary of the Ostdeutscher Heimatdienst (East German
Home Service). 151 Colonel Fedor Vinberg and his associates Lieutenant
Piotr Shabelskii-Bork and Lieutenant Sergei Taboritskii, who published
the far right newspaper The Call, compromised their position in Berlin by
supporting the Kapp Putsch.


various White emigres, Aufbau members support Kapp Pusht


	...AnotherlargeGerman-Russianmonarchicalconsultationwithkeyplay-
ers from the Kapp Putsch took place in Bavaria in early October 1920. The
participants discussed fostering closer ties between right-wing Germans
and White émigrés based in Germany and Vrangel’s regime. The Gen-
erals Ludendorff, Goltz of Latvian Intervention fame, and Max Hoff-
mann, who had negotiated with Soviet Foreign Minister Lev Trotskii in
Brest-Litovsk but had subsequently turned against the Bolsheviks, repre-
sented the German side of the discussions. Latvian Intervention comman-
der Colonel Bermondt-Avalov and General Biskupskii, the latter of whom
actually did not possess a mandate to represent General Vrangel as he
claimed, represented Russian interests. 66 General Goltz proposed sending
50,000 armed Germans, overwhelmingly officers, to Vrangel’s forces in the
CrimeaviaHungary. 67 Goltz’sformercollaboratorintheLatvianInterven-
tion, Major Bischoff, subsequently recruited German and Austrian officers
and soldiers for Vrangel’s forces from his new base in Austria.


Ludendorff working on some kind of deal for closer ties between right-wing Germans and White emigres.


	...UponhisreturntoMunichfromhisdangerousmissiontoGeneralVrangel’s
forces in the Crimea in late October 1920, Scheubner-Richter, who was
widelyregardedasanauthorityonRussianmattersamongvölkischGerman
circles, set about organizing Aufbau. 71 This conspiratorial organization
developedintothecenterofcooperationbetweenvölkischGermans,notably
includingHitlerandGeneralLudendorff,andpro-GermanWhiteémigrés.
Despite Aufbau’s crucial influence on the genesis and growth of National
Socialism, historians have neglected to subject the secretive association to
a thorough analysis.

	According to Aufbau’s statutes, the organization fostered the “national
interests of Germany and the Russian area of reconstruction.” Aufbau
soughtthe“promotionofanenergeticnationaleconomicpolicywithregard
totheEasternstates,especiallythosestatesthathaveformedontheterritory
of the former Russian Empire, for the reconstruction of the economic life
of these states or the Russian Empire.” 73 The imprecise language of Auf-
bau’s statutes sidestepped the crucial issue of whether the Russian Empire
was to be reconstructed as a unified whole, or whether the Ukraine and
the Baltic regions, for instance, were to be granted autonomy. This lack of
clarity was most likely intended to render the organization palatable both
to Great Russians and to minorities, most notably Ukrainians and Baltic
Germans who came from the margins of the former Russian Empire.


Aufbau a nexus of collaberation between german right-wing extremists and Russian white emigres, with Hitler and Ludendorff being notable parts of this collaberation.


Richter important in founding. Close with Hitler. More on him:


https://forum.axishistory.com/viewtopic.php?t=218737


"A German Officer During the Armenian Genocide: A Biography of Max Von Scheubner-Richter
by Paul Leverkuehn (Author), Hilmar Kaiser (Author)"

a book on him as german officer watching armenian genocide


"Russia and Germany: A Century of Conflict" another book on same topic as Kellog, but author sounds sketchy


	Aufbau closely controlled its membership, which tended to be wealthy,
and the organization carried out its activities in a strictly conspirato-
rial manner. Aufbau sought fiercely determined anti-Bolshevik Germans
and White émigrés, notably Russians, Ukrainians, and Baltic Germans,
as ordinary members. Interested people of other nationalities could join
as extraordinary members if they could demonstrate their commitment
to furthering Aufbau’s goals of far right German–Russian collaboration.
Ordinary members had to pay 100,000 marks upon admission into the
association and 20,000 marks in annual dues, whereas extraordinary mem-
bers had to disburse 10,000 marks to enter the organization and had to
contribute 50,000 marks annually. Aufbau’s leaders carefully checked the
background of prospective associates and could accept or reject applicants
withoutofferinganyexplanationfortheirdecision.Aufbau’sorganizational
work was carried out in complete secrecy.


a super secret society of german-russian collaberation against "jewish bolshevism"


	...After Vrangel’s anti-Bolshevik undertaking in the Crimea collapsed,
Scheubner-Richter had to concentrate on using völkisch Germans and
White émigrés centered in Bavaria to build Aufbau into a powerful con-
spiratorial organization. He regarded White émigrés in Germany from
whom he drew support as “pro-German and pro-culture.” 84 Through Auf-
bau, he sought to undermine socialists in Germany and the Bolshevik
regime, both of which he regarded as under the control of Jews. He acted
as the de facto leader of Aufbau, though officially he only held the post of
first secretary of the organization


Richter led Aufbau and liked to hire White emigres


	...WhileAufbaufailedtogainthesupportitdesiredfromtheGermanFor-
eign Office, the organization did attain considerable prestige by winning
over General Ludendorff, who had been Germany’s most valuable military
strategist during World War I and a driving force behind the Kapp Putsch.
Biskupskii established a close relationship with Ludendorff and helped to gain him for Aufbau’s cause. 93 Scheubner-Richter had long enjoyed
Ludendorff’s patronage, and he also played an important role in win-
ning the general for Aufbau. 94 Ludendorff found Aufbau with its marked
anti-Bolshevism and bold solutions to the “Eastern question” appealing.
Scheubner-Richter introduced Ludendorff to Hitler in the framework of
Aufbau in March 1921. Aufbau’s de facto leader thereby initiated a political
collaboration that culminated in the Hitler/Ludendorff Putsch of Novem-
ber 1923. 


Ludendorff close relationship with Biskupskii and Scheubner-Richter, digs Afbau, introduced to Hitler there


	...LudendorffcontributedsignificantlytoHitler’smilitaristicWeltanschau-
ung. In 1921, the general released a book, Kriegsführung und Politik (War
Leadership and Politics). In this work, he claimed along the lines of The
Protocols of the Elders of Zion: “The supreme government of the Jewish
people was working hand in hand with France and England. Perhaps it
was leading them both.” He further stressed that peace was only a period
of preparation for war. War brought “front-line socialism” that stabilized a
warrior community whose energies were directed outwards. 96 Hitler later
claimed that Ludendorff’s book “clearly pointed out where it was practical
to search [for the mistakes of the past and the possibilities for the future]
in Germany.” 



Ludendorff says "peace is only a period for preparation for war," blames Okhrana activities on Jews.


	...After the Kapp Putsch collapsed in Berlin in March 1920, Munich rose to
become the new hub of völkisch German–White émigré alliance. Former
nationalist German and White émigré Kapp Putsch conspirators, notably
General Erich von Ludendorff, his advisor Colonel Karl Bauer, Max von
Scheubner-Richter, and Vladimir Biskupskii, did not waste time in set-
ting up fresh intrigues from their new base in Bavaria. With the backing
of Bavarian industrialists, they sent a mission under Scheubner-Richter
to the Crimea to establish economic and military relations with General
Piotr Vrangel’s Southern Russian Armed Forces, which were based there.
Scheubner-Richter’sdelegationgainedthedesiredtermsofmutualsupport,
but this alliance proved brief, as the Red Army soon overran the Crimean
Peninsula. Nonetheless, this short-lived German–White émigré/White
connection inspired the creation of Aufbau, a secretive organization based
in Munich that sought to collect völkisch Germans and White émigrés for
joint action against the Weimar Republic and Bolshevik Russia.


After failing to overthrow Weimar Republic, Ludendorff, Richter, Bauer, Biskupskii try to set up collaberation with anti-Bolshevik white forces in Ukraine, but red army comes in and overruns them. Gives them the idea of creating Aufbau to have White-Emigres join up with German nationalists against Bolshevism and the Wiemar Republic.

What exactly was beef with Wiemer Republic? not sure but I think remember they were upset Weimer was going along with Versailles. So they basically built up their own army (which Versailles didn't really allow) and tried to take over themselves.


	...In his memoirs, the influential völkisch leader and former Aufbau mem-
ber General Erich von Ludendorff complained bitterly that it had proven
impossible to combine all White monarchical crosscurrents in Germany
into one stream. 1 Ludendorff’s assessment of the situation had merit.
While Aufbau convinced Hitler of the complementary nature of German
andRussiananti-Entente,anti-WeimarRepublic,anti-Bolshevik,andanti-
Semitic interests, the conspiratorial organization could not consolidate all
White émigrés in Germany (and beyond) under its leadership to form
a common front against the Weimar Republic and “Jewish Bolshevism.”
White émigrés seemed united at the May–June 1921 Monarchical Congress
at Bad Reichenhall in Bavaria that Aufbau had organized, but appearances
proved deceiving.

	In an increasingly acrimonious power struggle, Aufbau and Nikolai
Markov II’s Supreme Monarchical Council, which had been established
at the Bad Reichenhall Congress, offered divergent visions of how to over-
throw Bolshevism in the course of 1921–1923. Aufbau fostered National
Socialist–WhiteémigrécollaborationtoplaceGrandPrinceKirillRomanov
at the head of a Russian monarchy that would be allied with autonomous
Ukrainian and Baltic states. Markov II’s Council opposed Aufbau’s pro-
German designs for reorganizing the East. Despite operating from Berlin,
theCouncilincreasinglyvehementlybackedtheTsaristcandidacyofGrand
Prince Nikolai Nikolaevich Romanov, Kirill’s cousin, who lived in Paris
and had close ties with the French government. The Supreme Monarchical
Council counted on French military assistance in its schemes to topple the
Bolshevik regime.


Ludendorff complains that he can't get all the Whites under one banner, but decides to back one Monarch and fight with SMC backing another instead of something sensible like backing a White republic.

	
	...No White émigré-backed invasion of the Soviet Union materialized in
theearly1920s,largelybecauseofthejealousrivalriesamongWhiteémigrés
in Germany and Europe as a whole. In the end, Aufbau’s increasingly
bitter struggle against Markov II’s Supreme Monarchical Council sapped
the energy of Germany’s White émigré community. Aufbau even contem-
plated a hazardous tactical alliance with the Red Army to thwart French-
led designs to invade the Soviet Union with the support of White émigrés
who backed Nikolai Nikolaevich for Tsar. This desperate contingency plan
demonstrated the fragile nature of the apparent White unity that had been
established in 1921 at the Monarchical Congress at Bad Reichenhall. White
émigré discord provided a valuable respite to the still unstable Bolshevik
regime.


End result is Whites split and Bolsheviks rest easy

would guess one reason (excuse?) to back Kirill would be his ties to German nobility and his funding for Aufbau


	...Scheubner-Richter subsequently kept the Aufbau
member General Ludendorff away from General Lampe and ROVS. 73 At
the end of October 1921, Scheubner-Richter staged an ostentatious re-
founding of Aufbau with revised statutes. 74 He allotted a role in the lime-
lighttoLudendorffattheceremonytosignalthatthevölkischgeneralstood
firmly in the Aufbau camp.


Richter values Ludendorff in Aufbau, makes him the star for the renewed Aufbau


	...Anticipating Kirill’s arrival in Germany,
General Ludendorff worked to establish an intelligence service for Kirill
and his allies under Walther Nicolai in early April 1922.


Ludendorf trying to set up spies for Kirill


	...Nicolai met with Scheubner-Richter and Ludendorff in the middle of
April 1922 to discuss matters in greater detail. He agreed to establish an
anti-BolshevikintelligenceagencysothatLudendorffandhisallies,includ-
ing Scheubner-Richter, Kirill, and Hitler, would have a reliable source of
information on events in the Soviet Union. The money for the intelli-
genceservice,code-namedProjectS,camefromKirill.Nicolaibegansend-
ing regular reports to Scheubner-Richter in the first half of July 1922. 80
Scheubner-Richter expressed satisfaction with Aufbau’s intelligence infor-
mationinanOctober1922editionofAufbauCorrespondence.Henotedthat
agents were sending reports from Vienna, Budapest, the Balkans, Kiev, and
“other” cities in the Soviet Union. 81 In addition to using information from
Project S for Aufbau’s purposes, Scheubner-Richter passed intelligence on
to Hitler’s National Socialist Party, to which he belonged and with which
Aufbau was ever increasingly allied. 


also got intel for Aufbau--but who were there contancts? former Okhrana guys?


	Aufbau’s vice president, Biskupskii, played the leading role in the circle
around Kirill and Viktoria. He channeled General Ludendorff’s energies
into furthering Kirill’s cause. 98 Biskupskii greatly influenced Viktoria, who
had a far more dynamic personality than her somewhat drab husband. 99
Biskupskii acted as her closest advisor. 100 Viktoria ardently supported the
dashing general. She granted him considerable funding for his activities
in Aufbau in 1922, and she continually praised Aufbau to her husband. 101
Biskupskii later engendered a great deal of antipathy in the German White
émigré community when it became known that he had long been having
an affair with Viktoria and mainly owed his leading role in Kirill’s shadow
government to his lover’s recommendations.


Biskupskii channells Ludendorff's energies into furthering Kirill's cause. Bangs Kirill's wife to stay in her and Kirill's favor.

------


	As a sidelight to the major German-backed White endeavors that were
focused in and just outside the Ukraine, in September 1918, the former
Black Hundred member Lieutenant Piotr Shabelskii-Bork, who had been
releasedfromaBolshevikprisonthroughaMay1,1918amnesty,undertook
a dangerous undercover mission to help the Tsar and his family, whom he
believed to be still alive in Bolshevik captivity. He disguised himself as a
Bolshevik and traveled to Ekaterinburg in the Urals while it was still under
Bolshevik control. After White troops captured the city later in the month, he participated in the official investigation of the Bolshevik murder of the
Tsarist family. 


Shabelskii-Bork coming up with an excuse to go under-cover as a Bolshevik?


	TheWhiteinvestigatorsdiscoveredthattheTsaritsahadpossessedBlack
Hundred member Sergei Nilus’ The Great in the Small and the Anti-Christ
as an Imminent Political Possibility with a copy of The Protocols of the Elders
of Zion. They also noted that she had drawn a swastika in her room. 56 The
report that the White commission, which included Shabelskii-Bork, com-
piled eventually appeared in the Völkischer Beobachter (Völkisch Observer).
An article in a September 1920 edition of the newspaper, soon before the
paperbecametheofficialnewspaperoftheNationalSocialistParty,claimed
that Jews had murdered the Tsar and his family. The paper concluded this
from information in the White commission’s report that the walls in which
theassassinationoftheTsarandhisfamilyhadtakenplacehadbeencovered
with graffiti in German, Hungarian, and Hebrew.


and then "discovers" that Tsar had anti-semetic literature and were murdered by mysterious occultish Jews

Bork apparently a spy and a detective


interesting that Kurlov, Richter, and Bork all Russian emigres with an interest in intel hob-nobbing with Ludendorff and supporting Hitler.


	...Sakharov acted as a key intermediary between Kirill and Gen-
eralLudendorff. 104 SakharovalsodirectedintelligenceoperationsonKirill’s
behalf.Everymonth,theWhiteémigréAufbaumembersentquestionnaires
to Kirill’s representatives in diverse European cities.


Russian intel guy working for Kirill reporting to Ludendorff


	...Aufbauparticipatedinatleasttwoprominentterroristactsinleaguewith
Organization C. The Aufbau colleagues Piotr Shabelskii-Bork and Sergei
Taboritskii, who possessed ties with Ehrhardt’s secretive organization, mis-
takenly killed a prominent Russian Constitutional Democrat, Vladimir
Nabokov, in their attempt to assassinate the Constitutional Democratic
leader Pavel Miliukov. The evidence suggests that at least three Aufbau
members,GeneralBiskupskii,GeneralErichvonLudendorff,andhisadvi-
sorColonelKarlBauercolludedinOrganizationC’sshockingassassination
of Walther Rathenau, who served as Germany’s Foreign Minister. Aufbau
thus clearly acted as a terrorist organization.



Evidence suggests Ludendorff helped assassinate Walther Rathenau



	...In its anti-Bolshevik military schemes, Aufbau adopted a three-pronged
approach. Building upon the precedent of earlier German/White anti-
Bolshevik campaigns in the Ukraine and the Baltic region, Aufbau raised
armed forces for operations in these areas. Early Aufbau plans called for
an army under Archduke Vasily Vyshivannyi to advance into the Ukraine
whiletroopsunderthe1919LatvianInterventioncommanderColonelPavel
Bermondt-AvalovstruckintheBalticarea.Aufbaulaterplannedtofoment
revolt inside Soviet borders and then to launch an attack on the Russian
heartland of the Soviet Union under the direction of Biskupskii. Aufbau
sought to destroy Bolshevik rule and then to establish close political and
economictiesbetweenaNationalSocialistGermanyandNationalSocialist
Russian, Ukrainian, and Baltic states.


Aufbau raising funds for army, planning to invade Russia, Ukraine and to foment revolt in Soviet Union.


	...DespiteallitstalkofrestoringthemonarchytoRussia,Aufbauplanneda
NationalSocialistRussianstate.TheFrenchmilitaryintelligenceagencythe
SecondSectionconcludedinJune1923thatAufbausoughttomakeGeneral
Biskupskii the dictator of a Russian federation who would place Kirill or
Kirill’s son Vladimir, who was more popular, on the throne as a symbolic
figurehead. Aufbau’s support of the pro-Kirill movement in Russia thus
truly aimed at establishing a dictatorship in Russia along National Socialist
lines. This National Socialist Russian state would ally itself closely with
a National Socialist Germany. 102 The planned German–Russian National
SocialistalliancewastodirectitselfagainstthefledglingPolishstate.General
Ludendorff in particular and Aufbau leadership in general wished to attack
France’s ally Poland to win back areas that Germany had lost to the new
state after World War I, most notably parts of Upper Silesia and Posen
Province.



Aufbau wanted to install Nazi dictatorship in Russia, Ludendorff in particular wanted to invade Poland


	Theprecisetimingisunclear,butsometimein1923,theAufbauGenerals
Ludendorff and Biskupskii signed a pact regulating relations between the
planned National Socialist German and Russian states. The agreement
specified that after the overthrow of the Bolshevik regime, a Romanov
monarchy would be established in Russia in which Biskupskii would de
facto play the leading role. The new regime would represent a Russian
form of National Socialism. The accord also stipulated Austria’s Anschluss
(incorporation) into Germany as well as Poland’s partition between Ger-
many and Russia according to the borders of 1914. 104 Aufbau’s plans for an
alliancebetweenNationalSocialistGermanandRussianstates,whilenever
fulfilled, largely because of White émigré disunity, nonetheless reached a
high degree of specificity.


Ludendorff signed pact with Biskupskii for collaberation between German and Russian Nazi states if founded, to annex Austrian and divide up Poland. Had very specific plans that were discovered by French intelligence.


	...Scheubner-Richter’s aggressive political views deserve particular atten-
tion since he acted as the closest advisor of both Adolf Hitler and General
Erich von Ludendorff, who led anti-Weimar Republic paramilitary group-
ings in Bavaria that grew increasingly powerful under the stimulus of the
French/Belgian occupation of the Ruhr Basin beginning in early 1923.
Scheubner-Richter despised Bolshevism, and he spent much of his ener-
gies combating its spread. He nonetheless appreciated some of its aspects.
In particular, he admired what he regarded as the Bolshevik lesson that a
few determined men could shape world history, and he stressed that the
National Socialist movement should adopt the Bolshevik tactics of subver-
sionfollowedbystrictcentralizationandmilitarizationtodefeatitspolitical
enemies.


Richter close adviser to Ludendorff and Hitler, sounds like a Bolshevik in his admiration for idea that a few determined men could shape world history and pull shady shit to grab power.


Inspired by the Bolshevik model, Scheubner-Richter advocated using
paramilitary forces based in Bavaria under himself, Hitler, and Ludendorff
to overthrow the Weimar Republic. To a significant degree, he planned a
repeat of the March 1920 Kapp Putsch in which he, Hitler, and Luden-
dorff had participated, with similar White émigré support, only this time
from the south. Scheubner-Richter’s combative policy of seeking to topple
the Weimar Republic by force, in addition to costing him his life in the
November1923Hitler/LudendorffPutsch,helpedtocausethenear-collapse
of the National Socialist movement, the termination of Aufbau as a sig-
nificant political force, and the nadir of völkisch German–White émigré
collaboration.


Richter sounds oddly Bolshevik, got waxed in the second Hitler/Ludendorff Putsch.

curious as to how Putsch was stopped and if anyone wanted Richter dead.


	....Aufbau’s guiding figure Scheubner-Richter served as the pivotal con-
tact man for the Bavarian radical right in the period leading up to the
Hitler/Ludendorff Putsch. He officially began serving as the chief advisor
of the völkisch leader and Aufbau member General Ludendorff in August
1922. In the fall of 1922, Scheubner-Richter acted as the primary liaison
man between Hitler and Ludendorff. He coordinated their activities and
broughtthetwofarrightistsevercloserpolitically. 2 Scheubner-Richtermet
with Hitler, Ludendorff, and Walther Nicolai, the head of the pro-Kirill
Romanov intelligence service code named Project S, towards the end of
October 1922. The four conspirators agreed that Hitler should lead an
alliance of radical right paramilitary forces, the Vereinigte vaterländische
Verbände(UnitedPatrioticAssociationsofBavaria).Atthismeeting,Hitler
argued convincingly in favor of a legal rise to power. Nicolai agreed with
Hitler’s position, and, for the time being, the four plotters adopted this
plan of action.


Ludendorff and Hitler brought closer together politically by Richter, liason between them, arranged for coup along with the pro-Kirill intelligence service Project S. Decided Hitler should violently grab power but Hitler wanted to rise to power legally.


	TheseizureofpowerofBenitoMussolini’sFascistsinItalyinlateOctober
1922 inspired Scheubner-Richter and his allies Hitler and Ludendorff
to undertake increasingly aggressive measures in Germany. Scheubner-
Richter’s article in the November 1, 1922 edition of Aufbau Correspondence,
“TheFascistsasMastersinItaly,”indicatedthespurthatMussolini’sMarch
on Rome had given to radical rightists centered in Bavaria. Scheubner-
Richter stressed that Communism could only be defeated through its own
violent methods. He noted: “That which the German Freikorps did half-
heartedlywasdonepassionatelyinItaly.”HepraisedMussolinifordemon-
strating that “bold personalities” could master a “scourge” that held the
world in fear. While he asserted that pan-Germans could see “no friend” in
Fascism since difficult days lay ahead for the ethnic Germans of the South
Tyrol under Italian rule, he hoped that the “principle that the Fascists
represent” would become “universal and self-evident in Germany.”


Ricther says Communism can only be defeated though its own violent methods, admired Italian fascists for power grab.


	...The early Weimar Republic, which was never entirely stable at the best
of times, received an extreme shock in early January 1923 that aided far
rightists. French and Belgian authorities, claiming that the German gov-
ernment had reneged on its obligations under the Treaty of Versailles, sent
in troops to occupy Germany’s leading industrial region, the Ruhr Basin.
The French-Belgian advance into the Ruhr Basin worsened the already
ruinous inflation that plagued the Weimar Republic, and it spurred the
increasingly vigorous activities of the radical right centered in the National
Socialist/AufbaunexusofBavaria.InthemiddleofJanuary1923,theUnited
Patriotic Associations of Bavaria under Hitler and the Aufbau members
Ludendorff and Scheubner-Richter held a mass protest rally against the
French/Belgian occupation of the Ruhr Basin.


French troop occuption aids right-wing extremists, Hiter, Aufbau

happened while Poincare was Prime Minister--he had anything to do with it? Okhrana in general?

another way Versailles treaty helped Hitler

Poincare said to be initially reluctant for occupation of Ruhr, but eventually argued it was necessary to preserve Versailles treaty.

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Occupation_of_the_Ruhr
	According to Sally Marks, the occupation of the Ruhr "was profitable and caused neither the German hyperinflation, which began in 1922 and ballooned because of German responses to the Ruhr occupation, nor the franc's 1924 collapse, which arose from French financial practices and the evaporation of reparations".[20] Marks reckons the profits, after Ruhr-Rhineland occupation costs, were nearly 900 million gold marks.



	...Hitler and his collaborators possessed a large war chest for their putsch
preparations. Aufbau enjoyed a favorable financial situation. 39 General
Ludendorffinparticularhadaccesstoconsiderablefunds.AlthoughLuden-
dorff claimed in his memoirs that money had been sorely lacking among
White émigrés in Germany, the intelligence leader Nicolai stressed in
his diary that the general had only possessed substantial funding for his
operations during his period of activity in Aufbau. 40 In May 1922, Gen-
eral Biskupskii and his White émigré personal secretary, the enthusias-
tic National Socialist Arno Schickedanz, had made an arrangement with
Ludendorff whereby the latter was to use funds from the Russian throne
claimants Kirill and Viktoria Romanov to further the “German–Russian
national cause” in the framework of Aufbau. Ludendorff had pledged to
return the money as soon as he was able to, presumably when he held a
position of authority in Germany after helping to overthrow the Weimar
Republic.

	BeginninginMay1922andcontinuingthrough1923,KirillandViktoria
channeled approximately 500,000 gold marks to Ludendorff to support
nationalist German–Russian undertakings. 41 Since this amount of money
exceeded the discretionary means of Kirill and Viktoria, wealthy as they
were, substantial funding had to have come from outside sources. Most
importantly,therightwing,anti-SemiticAmericanindustrialistandpoliti-
cian Henry Ford gave considerable sums of money to Kirill’s representa-
tive in America, the Aufbau member Boris Brazol. Brazol then transferred
funds to Kirill and Viktoria for use in financing far right organizations in
Germany,notablytheNationalSocialistPartyandAufbau.


Ludendorff using funds from Kirill for 1923 Putsch. Henry Ford and Kirill hand him a whole bunch of money.

Russian oilmen also fund Richter

Aufbau funded Hitler and helped him a lot

Richter said to borrow Bolshevik idea of autocratic rule

	...Around the time that Hitler and Rosenberg established a personal con-
nection with Chamberlain, the greatest living völkisch theorist, relations
deterioratedrapidlybetweentheKahrgovernmentinBavariaandtheCom-
bat League under Hitler, Ludendorff, and Scheubner-Richter. In Septem-
ber 1923, Gustav Ritter von Kahr, now the virtual dictator of Bavaria
with the title of General State Commissioner, forbade mass gatherings of
the NSDAP. Kahr took this drastic step after Scheubner-Richter, Hitler’s
“influential political advisor,” had refused to guarantee him that no com-
plications would arise from such meetings. 63 Scheubner-Richter clearly
opposed Kahr, who earlier had helped to turn Bavaria into a haven for
völkisch German–White émigré collaboration. Scheubner-Richter’s nega-
tive attitude towards Kahr influenced Hitler.


Richter pisses off Kahr


	...The State Commissioner for the Supervision of Public Order noted
in early October 1923 that the friendship between Ehrhardt on one side
and Hitler, Ludendorff, and Scheubner-Richter on the other had greatly
deterioratedasoflate. 67 Ludendorffstressedatthetimethathehadnothing
to do with the remnants of Ehrhardt’s Organization C. He noted that
this grouping was working against him. Ludendorff even openly belittled
Ehrhardt as a “pest” in right-wing Munich circles in the course of the
month, thereby deepening the rift between himself and Ehrhardt. 


Ludendorf participates in a split between Aufbau camp and Ehrhardt/Organization C/Kahr government


	...Scheubner-Richter had further told the government informant that the
Germans had to fight against the French in the Ruhr Basin, and that it
would be better to die in the struggle against the French than to vegetate in
the face of such ignominy. Finally, Scheubner-Richter had claimed that the
mood amongst the men of the Combat League was even more enthusiastic
than among German soldiers in August 1914, at the outbreak of World
War I. 69 Scheubner-Richter overestimated the strength of the forces at his
disposal. This error would soon cost him his life.


Richter uses Ruhr occuptation to play up chances for 1923 Putsch


	Relations between General State Commissioner Kahr and the Combat
League under Hitler, Ludendorff, and Scheubner-Richter steadily deteri-
orated in late October and early November 1923. At a crucial Combat
League leadership meeting on October 23, 1923, Hitler stressed that Kahr
could not lead a successful putsch against Berlin since he had already failed
duringthe1920KappPutsch. 70 OnNovember5,1923,KahrcalledCombat
League leaders to his presence to give them an official protocol stating that
the Bavarian government, the Army, and the Bavarian Police would not
participate in any Combat League putsch. Hitler himself did not attend
this meeting. Instead, he sent Scheubner-Richter as his representative. 71
Hitler met with Scheubner-Richter the next day. Although Scheubner-
Richter had repeatedly assured his intelligence colleague Nicolai that he
would prevent a rash action on the part of the Combat League, he advised
HitlertoundertakeashowofforcetobeginGermany’s“liberation.” 72 This
plan of action led to debacle.


After meeting with Kahr, who didn't want to support Putsch, Richter tells Hitler to go ahead anyway while telling Nicolai the intel guy that he would prevent "rash action" from Combat League


	...Hitler launched his bid for power in Bavaria and beyond on November
8, 1923. He came to Scheubner-Richter’s dwelling in the afternoon just
after General Ludendorff had left. Scheubner-Richter gave Hitler a situ-
ation report and urged immediate action. Hitler told Scheubner-Richter
to accompany him to the beer hall Bürgerbräukeller in uniform, which he
did. 73 When Hitler entered the beer hall, where many Bavarian leaders
were gathered, including Kahr, the Aufbau member Rosenberg was at his
side. 74 Hitler fired his pistol at the ceiling and announced the outbreak
of a national revolution. He stressed in a fiery speech that the coup did
not oppose the Bavarian Police and the Army, but sought to overthrow
the “Berlin Jewish government and the November criminals of 1918.” 75
The putschists released an appeal, “To the Population of Munich!”, which
asserted that the “November Revolution” had met its end that day and
that therefore “one of the most ignominious periods in German history
has ended and the way has been cleared for the völkisch German freedom
movement.”


Hitler meets up with Richter right after Ludendorf leaves his house, then they go with Rosenberg to a beer hall with Kahr there and announce the Putsch


	...Hitler and Scheubner-Richter worked together in the putsch. While
Hitler negotiated with Kahr and other Bavarian leaders in a side room
of the beer hall while pointing a gun at them, Scheubner-Richter carried
out his own, ultimately unsuccessful, talks with high-ranking members
of the Bavarian Police. 77 He then drove Hitler’s car to pick up General
Ludendorff, who had been left out of the loop and had not participated in
the negotiations in the Bürgerbräukeller. Scheubner-Richter came home in
the early morning of November 9 and told his wife Mathilde that things
had gone “wonderfully,” without the shedding of blood.


Richter fails to win over Bavarian police. Drives Hitler's car to pick up Ludendorff, said to be left out of the loop and not in the Putsch. Richter tells his wife everythings going great.


some groups Hitler, Ludenndorff, and Richter counted on for support didn't show or failed to grab power.


	...Creating more problems for Hitler, Ludendorff, and Scheubner-
Richter, the former Organization C leader Captain Ehrhardt ordered
his followers in Munich not to join the Hitler/Ludendorff Putsch, largely
because of his differences with Ludendorff. 85 Ehrhardt fundamentally
agreed with National Socialist ideology, but, as he stressed in a speech soon
after the failure of the Hitler/Ludendorff Putsch, Hitler had attempted to
overthrow the Weimar Republic too soon. He should have ordered things
in Bavaria first and only then prepared for a march on Berlin. 8


Ehrhardt has differences with Ludendorff (who attacked him earlier), says Hitler tried to soon, and so doesn't support Putsch.


	...When pro-Kahr forces opened fire on the marchers after Kahr had with-
drawnthesupportthathehadearlierpledgedHitleratthepointofapistol,
a bullet struck Scheubner-Richter in the heart and sent him reeling, mor-
tally wounded. According to the version of events that Hitler subsequently
told Scheubner-Richter’s widow Mathilde, since he had been marching
arm in arm with Scheubner-Richter, he had been pulled down when her
husband had fallen. Then Scheubner-Richter in his dying convulsions had
pinned him down so that he could not get back up. 89 Theodor Endres of
District Defense Command VII offered a more plausible version of events,
namely that Hitler had thrown himself to the ground with the firing of the
first shots, thereby dislocating his shoulder. Endres stressed that Hitler’s act
had been the correct mode of action for a former active soldier to take and
had not been at all unheroic. Endres asserted that claims that Hitler had
only gone to the ground as a result of being pulled there were “as dumb as
alien to the front [lines in battle].”


"pro-Kahr forces" shoot Richter, right next to Hitler, while Hitler hits the dirt.


Hitler arrested and they go on to turn Richter into a martyr


https://www.britannica.com/event/Beer-Hall-Putsch
	Hitler and his men obtained agreement that the leaders there should join in carrying the “revolution” to Berlin (after the pattern of Benito Mussolini’s march on Rome in the preceding year); but the next day, on a march toward the Marienplatz in the centre of Munich, the approximately 3,000 Nazis were met by a fusillade of gunfire from a police cordon; 16 Nazis and 3 policemen died. The rebels then abandoned the project on thus learning that the government was prepared to counteract forcibly. At the subsequent trial in a sympathetic Bavarian court, Ludendorff was released, and Hitler was given a minimum sentence for treason—five years’ imprisonment. He actually served only eight months in the fortress of Landsberg, where he wrote much of his testamentary Mein Kampf (“My Struggle”). The abortive putsch gave Hitler worldwide fame but led him to decide to achieve power by legal means.


Is that it? they wanted him to be famous?


	...Biskupskii, who had been Aufbau’s leading figure after Scheubner-
Richter,experiencedseriousdifficultiesaftertheHitler/LudendorffPutsch.
Bavarianauthoritiessuspectedhimofcomplicityinthefailedundertaking.
Schickedanz, Biskupskii’s secretary in Aufbau, had prominently partici-
pated in the events of November 8/9. Moreover, Biskupskii was known to
haveadvisedLudendorffinthefallof1923.Despitethecompellingevidence
that Biskupskii had played a key behind-the-scenes role in the buildup to
and execution of the Hitler/Ludendorff Putsch, Bavarian authorities were
not able to prove that he had worked to incite Hitler, Ludendorff, and
Scheubner-Richter to rise against the Bavarian government with the ulti-
mate goal of marching on Berlin.


Biskupskii advised Hitler, Ludendorf for the Putsch but Bavarian authorities weren't able to pin it on him.


	...After the failure of the Hitler/Ludendorff Putsch, the death of
Scheubner-Richter, and the marginalization of Biskupskii, Aufbau lost in
statureandsoondisbanded.AfterthecatastrophiceventsofNovember8/9,
1923, Aufbau officially continued to exist under the direction of Kursell,
who headed the editorial staff of Aufbau Correspondence. 104 Aufbau soon
faded out, however. 105 The last issue of Aufbau Correspondence appeared on
June 15, 1924.


And that was the end of Aufbau.


Richter organized Hitler/Ludendorf Putsch, failed, Aufbau disintegrates although Rosenberg and Max Amann remain as Hitler associates

One thing Putsch did was give Aufbau a reason to disband, flee


	...After he came to power in January 1933, Hitler regularly commemorated
the events of November 8/9, 1923, in which Scheubner-Richter had par-
ticipated, with great pomp and reverence as a heroic undertaking that had
inspired nationalist resurgence. He placed a laurel wreath at the memorial
to his fallen comrades, most notably Scheubner-Richter, with the inscrip-
tion, “And you have triumphed after all!” 4 He spoke annually along the
lines of his November 1935 oration commemorating the 1923 Putsch:

	This brave action was not in vain. For in the end the great national movement
came out of it . . . While our enemies believed to have destroyed us, in reality,
the seeds of the movement were flung over all of Germany at a stroke . . . And
for us [these martyrs] are not dead. These temples are no tombs, but an eternal
sentry. Here they stand for Germany and keep watch for our people. Here they lie
as faithful witnesses of our movement.


Hitler decides Richter is some kind of hero



	...The German–Soviet partition of Poland beginning in September
1939, which initiated World War II, occurred in a manner similar to what
the Aufbau Generals Erich von Ludendorff and Vladimir Biskupskii had
envisioned in 1923, with the significant difference that Aufbau had wished
to divide Poland between National Socialist German and Russian states. 


Hitler a Russian stooge?


	...When Biskupskii, the head of the Russian Trust Authority, learned of
the Hitler–Stalin Pact, he rushed to three different German ministries to
gainanoverviewofthesituation.Hewasassuredthatthenewtreatywould
not affect the position of White émigrés in Germany. He further received
the pledge that the agreement he had concluded with Ludendorff in 1923
still remained in effect. These assurances helped to mollify him.
In conversations with another White émigré, Biskupskii noted that
Sovietleaderswerefollowinganimperialist,nationalistforeignpolicy,with
little trace of Communism. He emphasized that he had long predicted a
nationalistevolutionintheSovietUnion.Biskupskiistressedthattheinter-
nal situation in the Soviet Union was such that the Germans should find it
relatively easy to place a “people’s monarchy” in charge in place of Bolshe-
vik leadership. He hoped to play a leading role in this Russian monarchical
system, which would represent a Russian form of National Socialism. 81
While Biskupskii sought to regard the Hitler–Stalin Pact in a positive
light,theNationalSocialist–SovietallianceshockedtheWhiteémigrécom-
munity in Germany that he represented. White émigrés in Germany gen-
erally believed that the treaty meant the end of Germany’s support of the
Russian monarchical cause.


Biskuspskii plays down impact on White Emigre community, says some think Stalin closer to what they want, but White Emigress generally unhappy with the Hitler-Stalin pact



------


summary:

Ludendorf blames Jews for undermining Germany, similar to protocols. Says peace is only a period for preparation for war.

In June 1918, Ludendorf decides Bolsheviks can't be trusted and to work with Whites during Russian civil war. At one point has plans to declare war on Bolsheviks after Brest-Litovsk.

Lundendorf helps attempt to team up with Whites under General Vrangel, this idea leads to Aufbau. He wants to team up with white emigres to undermine bolshevism and Wiemer Republic.

Aufbau is a nexus for collaberation between proto-Nazis and White emigres. Radically anti-semetic and anti-Bolshevik.

Ludendorf is in with Aufbau, securing them funds (esp. from Kirill)

Aufbau has Kurlov and Kommissarov, former Okhrana guys, and Shabelskii-Bork, who at one point goes on a spy mission saying he'll pose as a Bolshevik to rescue the tsar and says he discovered a mystical jewish conspiracy killed tsar

Kommissarov also was caught working for Soviets, something which Aufbau said to have denied (Laquor book)

Also Richter, a sketchy White emigre possibly associated with Soviet intel, founds an "anti-Bolshevik" intel agency. Richter claims to hate Bolsheviks but admires their worst ideas. Richter is the one to introduce Lunendorff and Hitler and bring them closer together politically.

Richter close advisor to Ludendorf, makes him the star of a renewed Aufbau at one point

Ludendorf works to support Kirill, OGPU also supporting along with SMC?

Aufbau also fights SMC for support of Whites, helping to divide them during Russian civil war. Lunendorff complains that he can't unite Whites.

Ludendorf works to create intel agency, Project S, replacing Kurlov's intel agency

Ludendorf works with White emigres, Aufbau, Ricther for Kapp Putsch, mastermind of coup, draws on support from White emigres, organizations similar to Black Hundreds

Kapp Putsch serves to polarize Germany, give rise to socialist uprisings

Ludendorf also had a close relationship with Biskupskii, signs pact with him assuming Biskupskii will be Nazi dictator of Russia. Pact says they will divide Poland. Aufbau has oddly specific goals.

Ludendorf helps assassinate Walther Rathenau

Ludendorf the other big player in Beer Hall Putsch, arranged by Richter and helped by Poincarre decision to occupy Ruhr. Lunendorff using funds from Kirill (who uses funds from Henry Ford) for the Putsch. Biskupskii also involved, second leading Aufbau figure after Richter.

Lunendorf and Richter perhaps end up sabotaging the Putsch--Lunendorf pisses of Ehrhardt and Organization C, sides with Ricther who pisses off Kahr.

Richter encourages Hitler to go along with Putsch anyway, meeting with Lunendorff before Hitler, picks up Ludendorff in Hitler's car later.

Hitler doesn't get so much support for Putsch, possibly due to Ludendorf and Richter pissing off key allies earlier.

Putsch fails and Aufbau disbanded, although some members remain with Hitler who he appoints to lead Nazis while in jail writing Mein Kampft. The government had fired on Nazis and also killed Ricther. Putsch makes Hitler famous. Aufbau ideas stick with Hitler.

------

https://books.google.com/books?id=5madOAUfKZUC&pg=PA133&lpg=PA133&dq=%22Scheubner-Richter%22+Okhrana+OR+Cheka+OR+GPU+OR+OGPU&source=bl&ots=fNUfrZz_y9&sig=mNehLXbV6cbZ2xl9Qfle0Kw886M&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwiM1ZKSlNPWAhVC44MKHdBhAmEQ6AEIOjAH#v=onepage&q=%22Scheubner-Richter%22%20Okhrana%20OR%20Cheka%20OR%20GPU%20OR%20OGPU&f=false

	...It took the Russian monarchists several years to discover that this apparent co-operation with the 'inner emigration' was in fact a hoax that was carefully stage-managed y he Soviet political police in a not unsuccessful effort to infiltrate the Russian emigration.

	the story of this attempt, the so-called 'Trust', is of no direct reeevance in the present context.  While it lasted there was real cooperation between these two camps and through the Berlin and Munich emigre centers some leadig Nais were apparently involved too. Hitler seems to have been distrustful of Russian emigre politics from a very early date and warned ROsenberg. But Sheubner-Richter continued to co-operate with the Supreme Monarchical Council.
	There were peristent rumors in Germany that Schuebner-Richter had in effect a direct wire to Moscow; the Free Coprs commander, Captain Ehrhardt, claimed in 1923 to have been able to establish contact with the Soviet government via Sheubner-Richter. It sounds most unlikely, but what really happened we may never know, for those prominently involved int hese dealings have disappeared and have left no known records.

	...The basis of these remors was a report in the Russian eigre journal Russkoe Delo in Belgrade late in 1922, according to which General Komissarov had arrivedin Munich for secret talks with Scheubner-Richter and Biskupsky. Komissarov had been one of the central figures in the Tsarist Okhrana between 1900 an 1917; he played a prominant part in the instigation of pogroms, in liason with the Black Hundred, and, for a time, in the Rasputin affair. Later he was said to be working for the Cheka. This report, at once denied (Aufbau, Feburary 7, 1923), was still quoted in exchanges between Biskupsky and Himmler twelve years later.


http://www.larouchepub.com/eiw/public/1988/eirv15n03-19880115/eirv15n03-19880115_026-new_kgb_history_skirts_lessons_o.pdf
	The Trust

	This political genealogy of  the  February Revolution's command staff provides clues to the nature of both Russian Revolutions of 1917, as turning points in a world-strategic shift, engineered by the cultural and political gamemasters of  the  day. A  deeper look may be  obtained, by  means of investigating the Cheka' s famous spy enterprise of the 1920s, the Trust. 

	Dziak devotes Chapter 3 of Chekisty to the Trust, includ­ing its ancestor, the Lockhart Plot of 1918, as "the first of a Soviet genre of spurious dissident movements designed to surface and entrap opponents and their Western sympathiz­ers." 


so "The Trust" was some pro-White Chekist front?


	...Numerous Russian aristocrats, from families that had worked for a  dynastic change, were active collaborators of the Trust, even as some cultivated the image of being fierce anti-Bolsheviks. Many valued the Bol­sheviks as the harbinger of a  "rebirth of Russia." Among them were members of the Obolensky, Trubetskoi, Dolgo­rukov, Artamonov, Shirinsky-Shikhmatov, Svyatopolk­Mirsky, and Lieven families. 

	Prince Yuri A. Shirinsky-Shikhmatov, known as  the chief ideologist of the emigre Supreme Monarchical Council, worked out the bitterly anti-Western ideology of the SMC in conjunction with Cheka agent Yakushev. Prince Yuri liked the idea of a "Soviet monarchy," around which all Russians, Red or White, must rally, as "the only path of complete liberation of Russia.  .  . from the yoke of Western culture." 


so Cheka involved with SMC somehow, who backed Markov II. But apparently Richter collaberated with them too?



------


Taylor:


	After 1916 the Kaiser was a mere figurehead; the real dictator, not only in military but in civilian affairs, was General—eventually Field Marshal—Erich Ludendorff, the politically illiterate apostle of rule by the sword, who as First Quartermaster-general of the armies completely dominated his nominal superior, the new Commander-in-Chief, General von Hindenburg.


Ludendorff the military dictator during WW1

	The official camera portraits of Ludendorff at the peak of his extraordinary career are prime fossil specimens of European history. Brutal and blubbery, he looks almost literally literally bloated with self-awe. The features are unmistakably plebeian—Ludendorff was one of the few Prussian staff officers of lower middle-class origin—but without any redeeming touch of homely humanity. In the cold, hooded eyes, the gross pompous jowls, the overfed old woman’s chin and the mouth like a cuttlefish’s, we can recognize a kind of transitional form between the men of blood and iron who created the German Empire and the “flabby monsters” (in the words of Georges Bernanos) who finally destroyed it Ludendorff, who was forty-nine at the outbreak of war counts among the foremost wreckers of European civilization in his generation. Before he collapsed into his Wotan-worshiping senility, during the 1930s, he was to play a substantial role in pushing the Hohenzollern dynasty to its doom, in launching the Nazi nightmare on the world, and in assuring the ultimate triumph of Bolshevism in Russia. It was the war, of course, that gave him his chance—he planned the brilliant German attack on the fortress of Liège and was Hindenburg’s Chief of Staff at Tannenberg-but his meteoric rise to a position of almost unbounded if irresponsible power is a devastating commentary on Wilhelmine society, on the limitations of the German military caste and on the deficiencies of the Hohenzollern family.


Ludendorff helped doom Germany, launch Nais, and assure triumph of Bolshevism

had some military successes

also said to be flabby

	...Its commander, Jozef Pilsudski, who was to be the first head of the resurrected Polish state, rivaled the talent for conspiratorial organization of his Czech analogues (and enemies) Masaryk and Benes, but he was utterly unlike them in nearly every other way. A complex, slender catlike man with a small head and sensitive gray-blue eyes, Pilsudski had something about him that suggested the artist and the dreamer, but his dreams were often strangely akin to other men’s nightmares. He had been conspiring almost ever since he had started breathing, and even by Russian revolutionary standards was considered a ruthless terrorist.


lol


	...Pilsudski was not Ludendorff’s sole headache in the area of political warfare. The German witch doctors—with the active support of Ludendorff himself—must be credited with what was at once the most brilliant and the most calamitously self-defeating operation in the entire history of political warfare: the encouragement and support of the Bolshevik Revolution.


Ludendorff actively enoucraged and supported the German support of Bolsheviks


	...When the victorious United States Army in 1945 stumbled upon the cache where the secret files of the German Foreign Office had been stored, there were several documents going back to the times of the First World War that our Soviet Allies would have given a great deal to lay their hands on first. One of these items, of outstanding interest to historians was a memorandum dated March 9, 1915, setting forth a comprehensive program for German political warfare against Czarist Russia. The paper included the usual proposals for blowing up bridges and for spreading defeatist propaganda among Russian conscripts; it urged getting in touch with, and giving financial assistance to, most of the socialist opposition and a number of national minority organizations (with the exception of the Zionist Jews, whom the author of the plan considered “incapable of any political action”). More noteworthy was the overriding importance attached to working with the émigré leaders of the Russian Bolsheviks, who at the time were generally considered in the West as a splinter group of doctrinaire extremists. Among eleven specific recommendations for achieving the objectives of the program, number one was “Financial support for the majority group of the Russian Social Democrats [Bolsheviks], which is fighting the Czarist government with all the means at its disposal.” The broad philosophical sweep of the memorandum was likewise striking.


U.S. uncovered docs saying Germans wanted to support Bolsheviks financially, get in touch with Bolshevik emigres.


	“Thus,” read one specially lofty passage, “the armies of the Central Powers and the [Russian] revolutionary movement will shatter the colossal political centralization which is the embodiment of the Czarist Empire and which will be a danger to world peace for as long as it is allowed to survive, and will conquer the stronghold of political reaction in Europe.”



maybe they got it backwards


guy who wrote it, Dr. Alexander Helfand AKA Parvus, was in with Trotsky and Soviets in 1905

arrested by Okhrana with Trotsky

got in with the Germans at Constantinople and wrote the memo about supporting Bolsheviks

also in touch with Lenin, some Lenin associates

Bolshevik underground supplied Germans with intelligence reports


	The decisive German contribution to the Bolshevik cause was, of course, allowing Lenin after the March Revolution to return to Russia across German territory—he had no other dependable way of reaching his destination. As far as is known, the idea originated with the Bolshevik émigrés in Switzerland, and the approach to the Germans was made unofficially, through a Swiss Socialist leader and the Swiss government. There may have been earlier direct or indirect contacts between individual émigrés and German agents concerning the project, but if so there is no record of them in the Wilhelmstrasse files. The first official German mention of the affair is a telegram from the German minister in Bern, dated March 23, 1917, and apparently inspired by information from the Swiss Foreign Office, reporting the desire of the leading Russian revolutionaries in Switzerland to return to their homeland via Germany.


Bolsheviks wanted Lenin to return, Germany only way, they are for it


	The Germans showed themselves understanding and co-operative on all these points. Their realization of the need to protect the reputations of the travelers is brought out in several of the Wilhelmstrasse documents. The military and police authorities raised no pedantic issue of “security”; it was assuring the security of the émigrés that mainly seemed to cause them concern. The final decision to authorize the trip was referred to the highest governmental and military authorities, including Ludendorff and the Kaiser. Judging from a memorandum in the Foreign Office files, Wilhelm took a keen, if somewhat fatuous, interest in the operation. “His Majesty the Kaiser,” records the memorandum, “suggested at breakfast today that the Russian Socialists traveling through Germany should be given White Books and other literature, such as copies of the Easter Message and of the Chancellor’s speech, so that they may be able to enlighten others in their own country. In the event of the Russians being refused entry into Sweden, the High Command of the Army would be prepared to get them into Russia through German lines.”


Ludendorff and Kaiser authorized trip, Kaiser wanted them to be given German propaganda.


	By way of reply, he turned away from the official delegation and spoke directly to the crowd. “Dear Comrades, soldiers, sailors and workers,” Lenin began. “I am happy to greet in your persons the victorious Russian revolution, and greet you as the vanguard of the worldwide proletarian army...the piratical imperialist war is the beginning of civil war throughout Europe...any day now the whole of European capitalism may crash....Long live the worldwide socialist revolution.” In a second address on leaving the station, Lenin briefly denounced “the shameful imperialist slaughter.”

	In the context of the occasion it was a declaration of war against the Provisional Government, and an undisguised appeal to organized defeatism and sedition. The local Bolsheviks who were present—they included Kamenev and Stalin—looked acutely unhappy. The representatives of the other revolutionary parties naturally were furious. Sukhanov even heard a soldier later in the day declare, “We ought to stick our bayonets into a fellow like that.” From the German viewpoint everything had gone off perfectly.

	LENIN’S ENTRY INTO RUSSIA SUCCESSFUL, a telegram from the German Ambassador in Stockholm reported on April 17. HE IS WORKING EXACTLY AS WE WOULD WISH.

	Perhaps if the German political warriors had seen the verbatim text of Lenin’s remarks at the Finland Station their admiration at their own cleverness might have been tinctured with some slight uneasiness for the more distant future.


Lenin shows up, starts his anti-war anti-government schpeil, German ambassador says Lenin "working exactly as we would wish."


	...even German delegates felt that the precarious Soviet regime was being strained to the breaking point, but this did not worry General Ludendorff, the occult dictator of Germany and the real author of the Brest-Litovsk diktat. “Paranoia had him [Ludendorff] in its grip,” declares John W. Wheeler-Bennett in his masterly Brest-Litovsk: The Forgotten Peace, and the diagnosis seems plausible. Ludendorff’s ultimate aim was the total dismemberment of Russia


Ludendorff pushes for Brest-Litovsk


	...Bolshevik demagogy had disintegrated the Russian army as a force-in-being, and the Soviet government was virtually at the mercy of the victorious Germans. In a feeble attempt to exert counter-pressure the Bolsheviks intensified revolutionary agitation and propaganda among German or Austro-Hungarian prisoners of war held in Russia—a fateful step from the long-term viewpoint, but one without significant immediate results. Trotsky meanwhile used all the resources of his cunning to drag out the negotiations. Finally on March 3 after the German armies had resumed their advance, and were nearing Petrograd, the Soviet government accepted Ludendorff’s terms, signing away more than a quarter of Russia’s national territory and some 75 per cent of her coal and steel plants.


Ludendorff advanced troops until he got his terms, Russia giving up quarter of territory and 75 per cent of coal and steel plants.


	...In order to release as many troops as possible for transfer to the western front, and to insure a steady flow of grain and other raw materials, it was imperative to avoid any new exactions that might goad the Soviet government into denouncing the Treaty of Brest-Litovsk; in fact it might be necessary to shore up the Soviets with financial and economic assistance (which the Germans did actually provide during the summer of 1918) to make sure that they were not replaced by a more hostile regime. PLEASE USE LARGER SUMS the German Secretary of State (Foreign Minister) wired Count Mirbach, the Kaiser’s special Ambassador to the Soviet government, in May 1918, AS IT IS GREATLY IN OUR INTEREST THAT THE BOLSHEVIKS SHOULD SURVIVE. At the same time Ludendorff was determined to keep the Bolsheviks weak, so that they would be easy to liquidate after Germany had won the war in the West, and in the meantime he wanted to squeeze every possible drop of blood out of them. Ludendorff’s Soviet policy was a large-scale version of the human-icebox technique by which Papuan cannibals keep their captives alive while progressively slicing off pieces of their flesh. Thus while the large German mission in Moscow—where the government had established itself in March 1918—backed the Soviets against the counterrevolutionary authorities in the south, whom the Allies were supporting, the German forces in Finland and in the Ukraine—and eventually in the Caucasus—helped the local anti-Bolshevik governments to fight the Reds who were loyal to the central government.


What was Ludendorff doing exactly? sounds like Lunendorff acted in a manner to support Bolsheviks while also attacking them.


	Ideological factors naturally aggravated the imbroglio. Most of the White leaders were pro-Allied, but some were ready to accept support from any quarter and a few were actively pro-German. From the German viewpoint these were worth building up as a sort of second team to put in in case the Bolsheviks proved unco-operative or were overthrown. But the pro-German Whites were nearly all monarchists and restoring the Romanov dynasty might seriously hamper the ultimate German plan for dismembering Russia.


The pro-German Whites said to also be monarchists


	“Famine is on the way and is being choked off with terror,” the counselor of the German mission wrote at the beginning of June in an informal report that vividly sketched the difficulties of the Bolshevik situation and urged making a deal with their likely successors. “People are quietly shot by the hundred. All this in itself is not so bad, but there can be no doubt that the physical means with which the Bolsheviks are maintaining their power are running out...To facilitate the restoration of a Russia which would again be imperialist is not a pleasant perspective, but the development may perhaps be inevitable.”

	Even Ludendorff agreed that a new approach might be necessary.

	“Though we now negotiate only with the Soviet government,” he wrote on June 9, “...We have to acquire contacts with the right-wing monarchist groups and influence them so that the monarchist movement would be governed by our wishes as soon as it gained influence.”


Ludendorff wants to work with "monarchist groups" immediately after Brest-Litovsk


	In March 1918, with Russia knocked out of the war and with American troops still mostly at the training camps, the German High Command had unleashed the “Kaiser’s Battle” which was to be the final and fatal offensive against the Allies on the Western Front. The pompous name given this attack—or rather series of attacks—turned out, however, to be an injudicious compliment to the All Highest. None of the sledgehammer blows delivered against the Allies proved decisive. By July the tide began to turn, and General Ludendorff, faced with the growing build-up of fresh American troops on one hand—General Pershing already had 19 infantry divisions at the front in early August—and with the dwindling of German reserves on the other, privately conceded that all hope of victory in the field was gone. But he would do nothing to prepare peace, and he refused to inform the government. “The Wilhelmstrasse is frightened enough now; if they knew the true military situation it would be a catastrophe,” he said. Obstinately the High Command, whose dictatorship over the government and even over the Kaiser, was complete, continued to maintain that “there is no ground for doubting our victory.”


Ludendorff decides to continue war on Western front, decides not to inform government and troops of situation with American build-up. Does nothing to prepare peace.

Could this have contributed to socialist propaganda working among German troops? Would feel like their government was lying to them, sending them to their deaths for no reason.


	By September all the gains of the great spring offensive had been lost, and the outer bastions of the Central Powers were crumbling everywhere. Austria was beginning to buckle, and, on September 26, Bulgaria dropped out of the war.


	Suddenly, Ludendorff’s nerves gave way. The Great General Headquarters of the German Army was in the little Belgian watering resort of Spa, famous for its mineral springs. In the late afternoon of September 28, the faint buzz of conversation, heel-clicking and spur-jangling which had replaced the peacetime clinking of teacups under the potted palms in the hall of the Hotel Britannique was suddenly hushed as General Ludendorff, escorted by his aides, his face gray above the “pour le Mérite” cross at his throat, made his way to Marshal Hindenburg’s office. Gaspingly he told the Marshal, who looked more than ever like a wood carving of a St. Bernard dog, that an armistice must be concluded immediately, and that a new German government capable of obtaining favorable terms on the basis of President Wilson’s Fourteen Points must be formed at once.


Ludendorff decides to inform government peace needed after prolonging war and Germany losing a lot.


	According to all accounts, the Kaiser received the news that the German armies were defeated and that an armistice must be promptly obtained with unusual dignity. The decision to proclaim a parliamentary regime and to form a new government was taken easily, since the General Staff said it was needed, although the Kaiser countered Ludendorff’s frantic pleas for haste with some asperity. “You could have told me all this a fortnight ago,” he said. “I can’t work miracles.”


Ludendorf with "frantic pleas for haste" to reach peace deal (why?)


	...It is likely that neither Ludendorff nor Hindenburg had seriously read Wilson’s speeches. An armistice was needed to save the German Army from destruction. Peace would be a matter of negotiation, they thought. But now the ground upon which they stood crumbled. By their démarche they had utterly destroyed the morale of the German people. The soldiers in the trenches who had suffered terrible losses ever since the Kaiserschlacht had been launched could see no reason to procrastinate. What stood in the way of peace? On October 14, a note of President Wilson gave them the answer, by drawing attention to one of his conditions: “The destruction of every arbitrary power anywhere that can separately, secretly and of its single choice disturb the peace of the world.”


Ludendorf helped create panic in government, army. Suddenly Germans leanred they lost the war while still fighting.


	...Three hundred Communists headed by a sailor invaded the War Office. Liebknecht proclaimed a provisional government, and for three days the Reds held Berlin in their power. Noske counterattacked on January 9 with regular troops and volunteers from the Free Corps armed with howitzers and machine guns. On January 11 some 3000 veteran infantrymen entered the Wilhelmstrasse, and by January 15, Berlin was once more in the hands of the government. Repression was ruthless and earned the Defense Minister the nickname of “Mörder Noske” (“Murder Noske”). The two Communist leaders, Karl Liebknecht and Rosa Luxembourg, were arrested in the suburbs, by officers of the Guard Cavalry Division, and brought back to divisional headquarters at the Hotel Eden in Berlin. The officers dragged the elderly Rosa Luxembourg—a frail gray-haired idealist, despite her flamboyant nickname, “Red Rosa,” and her extremist convictions—into the Tiergarten, where, after severe mishandling, she was finished off with revolver shots and thrown into the Landwehr Canal. Karl Liebknecht was shot “while attempting to escape.” The sordid pattern of things to come was taking shape.


Communists try to take over Berlin, a crackdown on them happens and some murdered


	...It was not Adolf Hitler who spoke thus, nor any of the gutter barbarians who would soon be flocking to his Swastika standard, but a cultivated young Prussian of good family, the writer Ernst von Salomon. Though soon to be involved in the demented assassination of the Jewish politician-industrialist Walter Rathenau (as great a nationalist as his murderers),


interesting, Taylor says Rathenau wasn't so great


------


https://www.marxists.org/archive/trotsky/1930/mylife/ch25.htm


Trotsky stronlgy dismisses accusations by Kerensky that Lenin an agent of Ludendorff



------

https://feet2thefire.wordpress.com/2013/06/24/eric-ludendorff-the-german-general-who-ruined-the-20th-century-almost-all-by-himself/

not the best source


but says Ludendorff pushed for unrestricted submarine warfare, which brought in Americans, sent Lenin to Russia to "compensate"

Ludendorff also popularized "stab in back" idea?


------


https://books.google.com/books?id=gnEWm4kC844C&pg=PR28&lpg=PR28&dq=Ludendorff+clandestine+support+for+Bolsheviks&source=bl&ots=TYjWsBslaj&sig=GY9frZ6MITEo_itn-T_bmZH2x0E&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwiL38uygNTWAhUi44MKHecJA1cQ6AEIJjAA#v=onepage&q=Ludendorff%20clandestine%20support%20for%20Bolsheviks&f=false

Germans had bad luck with intelligence, only notable successfull inteligence op support for Bolsheviks



------

https://wwi.lib.byu.edu/index.php/Ludendorff
	When war came in August 1914, fortune smiled. In the confusion of the attack on Liège, Ludendorff received the surrender of the city, and Germany had its first war hero. The Kaiser personally decorated him with Prussia's highest award, the Pour le merité, the second of the war. The situation in the east, where two Russian armies threatened to break through German defenses, demanded his brilliance and capability for superb staff work. As a counterweight to his volatility, the High Command recalled from retirement General Paul v. Hindenburg, a phlegmatic, no-nonsense, even cautious officer, to command 8th Army. Ludendorff became chief of staff. The two generals met for the first time en route to East Prussia. The situation they confronted was threatening and risky, but by no means hopeless. With the able assistance of the 8th Army's operations officer, Max Hoffmann, the Germans routed the Russians at the Battles of Tannenberg (August 1914) and Masurian Lakes (September 1914). The impressive victories electrified Germany and cemented Ludendorff's reputation as the man of genius. The image of the invincible duo of Hindenburg and Ludendorff took root in the German mind. They became legends to a people demoralized by the bloody stalemate in the west. For Ludendorff, who grew increasingly critical of the western war effort, the lack of success reflected a lack of will. He called for "total war." Convinced of his own judgment, his vocal criticism of the war effort mounted, and he campaigned endlessly against those who opposed him.


Ludendorf pro war, became popular during war (with help from press?)

implemened brutal "hindenberg plan"


	...Convinced that only total effort could achieve victory, Ludendorff shrank from nothing. Accepting the Navy's contention that a return to unrestricted submarine warfare would bring a halt to the delivery of vital American munitions, Ludendorff urged its adoption knowing America would enter the war. He severely underestimated both the U.S. military potential and the speed with which it could be brought to bear.


Did he want America to enter the war? Germany to lose? supposedly this led to idea of supporting Bolsheviks on Eastern front.


	By now there were voices of opposition in Germany to his increasingly bullying manner and excessive authority. Hardly an area of German life remained outside his grasp by 1918. The Kaiser loathed and feared him, but he could not stand up to him. Ludendorff contemptuously dismissed peace initiatives and war weariness as manifestations of a lack of will. He spared no one, including himself and his family. Two of his stepsons fell in combat, losses which made him harder. He relentlessly attacked those who opposed his measures, including Chancellor Bethmann-Hollweg, whom he forced from office by mid-1917.

	The submarine campaign served only to bring the U.S. into the war. American forces began arriving at a rate undreamed of by their foes. Only the collapse of Russia under the Bolsheviks, to which Ludendorff had indirectly contributed by transporting Lenin from Switzerland to Russia, brightened the otherwise disastrous picture. Convinced any peace terms would be unacceptable, a belief fed indirectly by his own draconic demands upon the hapless Russians, he cobbled together the esources for one last great push, the Spring Offensive of 1918. By stripping units from the east, Ludendorff increased his strength in the west by 30%. Special units (Storm Battalions) trained in new, infiltration tactics, used surprise and mobility to by-pass enemy strong points and emerge behind enemy lines into the open. Traditional infantry units following along reduced the by-passed areas. A complete absence of the new weapon, the tank, constituted a major weakness to the otherwise formidable restructuring. Ludendorff had seen tanks, but he belittled their importance and dismissed his soldiers' concerns as a lack of will, a strange lapse in a man who usually incorporated his subordinates' suggestions.


became dictorial, forcing people out of office. In out-of-character move, decided to forgo tanks in his great push.


	...Ludendorff collapsed under the stress. He had lost his second son in the offensive, and on occasion his ravings against defeatists and incompetent civilians turned into uncontrollable tantrums. On the 28th of September, he told Hindenburg and his staff that Germany must seek an immediate armistice. The Kaiser and Chancellor Hertling heard this sad news the next day, and agreed. When Ludendorff later publicly reversed his position about Germany's ability to continue the war, the Kaiser demanded his resignation.


freaks out to Kaiser and says Germany lost, then tells public they can still fight


	Ludendorff's post-war career tarnished his reputation. Fearing revenge, he fled temporarily to Sweden. He wrote his memoirs, blaming Germany's defeat on his innumerable foes and their lack of will power. He railed at the new Republic and his new enemies, the Jews, Jesuits and Freemasons, whom he blamed for stabbing Germany in the back. He became the darling of the extreme right, marching with Hitler during the Beer Hall Putsch. In 1925 he ran for Reich President, polling a mere 1%. His views and demons grew more extreme, and he fell to bickering with Hitler and his former wartime comrades. One-by-one he broke relations with his staff and colleagues, including his wife whom he suddenly left for Mathilde v. Kemnitz, a folklore specialist. She encouraged his fantasies. In 1935 he published The Total War, reversing Clausewitz's dictum and arguing that politics must serve war. On 22 December 1937 he died, shortly after declining Hitler's offer of promotion to field marshal with the remark, "a field marshal is born, not made."


------


https://answers.yahoo.com/question/index?qid=20070928114420AAFrayY
	Ludendorff certainly did support German-backing for Lenin to stir up revolution in Russia; and then to sustain the Bolsheviks in power. Ludendorff was not the only German leader to pursue this course. Indeed, German policy and actions to support Russian revolutionaries originated well before Ludendorff came to power. The German High Command consistently approved this activity, for the good military reason of destroying Russia’s ability to wage war.

	As “russkimuzhik” states, “Parvus” (Israel Lazarevich Gelfand) was the agent through whom the German government chose to channel its financial support. From early 1915 onwards, Germany funded Parvus with substantial sums of money to finance Russian revolutionaries.

	It was Parvus who persuaded Germany to focus its support on Lenin’s Bolshevik revolutionary faction, instead of spreading the money around amongst other anti-Tsar groups. Bolshevik policy seemed ideally suited to Germany’s aims, because the Bolsheviks aimed to make peace with Germany if ever they took power in Russia. In April 1917, a German-Bolshevik agreement was finalized on paper, and Germany set up the arrangements for Lenin and his cronies to be ferried from Switzerland, across Germany and Sweden by train, so that he could return to Russia via Finland.

	But if any pact existed between Ludendorff and Lenin it was one of temporary convenience, patching over mutual mistrust and deception. Ludendorff may have been saying to himself, "Lenin will overthrow the Russian patriots, and then I will strangle Lenin and his friends". But Lenin was thinking, "I shall pass through Germany in Ludendorff's train, but for his services I shall pay Ludendorff in my own way". His farewell letter to the Swiss workers, written on the day of his departure, leaves no doubt as to his intentions towards Germany. "We will carry on a revolutionary struggle against the German bourgeoisie.”

	Germany continued to fund Lenin after the Bolshevik revolution succeeded. Now, Ludendorff’s aim was to keep in power a Russian government that was committed to ending the war.

	Later, of course, after communist revolutionaries had attempted to overthrow the German government, Ludendorff tried to absolve himself and the entire German military from having aided Lenin. He claimed that German support for the Bolsheviks had been a mistaken policy of German civilian administrations (particularly of Bethmann-Hollweg). This is not true. The German High Command may not have originated Germany’s “support Lenin” policy. But Ludendorff and his colleagues wholeheartedly endorsed the policy.

	Source(s): "The Forgotten Peace, Brest-Litovsk March 1918"
	by John W. Wheeler-Bennett. 

	"Germany and the Revolution in Russia, 1915-1918: Documents from the Archives of the German Foreign Ministry" by Z. A. B. Zeman 



second book:

https://archive.org/details/Germany-and-Revolution-in-Russia-1915-1918


-----

https://archive.org/stream/ludendorffsownst00lude/ludendorffsownst00lude_djvu.txt
	Many Germans felt grave anxiety in this position 
and gave sharp expression to their fears in all direc- 
tions. In contrast to their Government, they had far- 
seeing ideas. These utterances were, however, merely 
those of private persons, and had no more importance 
or meaning for us than corresponding statements had 
in other countries. This habit of speaking out was 
not changed during the war. The war aims of the 
Governments and peoples of the Entente were always 
more far-reaching than the dreams of individual Ger- 
mans. We know this now to our cost. 

Plans for world dominion demand a strong national 
feeUng. This, in spite of the foundation of the Em- 
pire in 187 1, we have never achieved. Our Govern- 
ment in the post-Bismarck period did nothing to cul- 
tivate it. On the contrary, we lost it as we lost our 
strength of will. In our poHtical thought we have re- 
mained too "federal," and have retained too deep in-ternal political divisions. We came into the world too 
soon, without any national sentiment, and in our sense 
of world citizenship, bom of foreign influences, we have 
never found the true level between thinking nationally 
and thinking internationally, between our domestic 
and our external interests. 


Contrary to the arguments oi the enemy propaganda, 
no dreams of world mastery, no "nationalism" of the 
German Government, endangered the peace before 
1 9 14 or have prevented its conclusion during the war. 
After all, propaganda did not set out to tell the truth, 
but merely to break down the determination and the 
fighting spirit of the German people and to spread views 
that would serve its own ends. 



Blames Etente for wanting "world dominion" but says he was just defending his country


	...In the last stages of the war, and quite openly from 
the beginning of 1918 onward, propaganda worked ever 
more clearly for the social revolution, side by side with 
the political revolution. The war was painted as being 
waged by the upper ten thousand at the expense of the 
workers, and the victory of Germany as the workers' 
misfortune. 

The enemy propaganda, and Bolshevism, which aimed 
at a world revolution, were working for the same ends in 
Germany. England gave China opium, our enemies 
gave us the revolution, and we accepted the poison 
and distributed it, as the Chinese distribute opium.


Since 1918 blames Bolshevism for Germany losing the war


but isn't this what he wanted to happen in Russia with Lenin?


	...ResponsibiUty for the war, the Belgian atrocities, the 
ill-treatment of prisoners, our political immorality and 
treachery, our mendacity and brutality, the arbitrary 
Government of Prussianized Germany, the enslave- 
ment of the German people, all these reproaches were 
cleverly invented, for the purposes of the campaign 
of lies against us and had the greatest effect all over the 
world. Side by side with these, the catchwords of the 
fight for democracy against militarism, autocracy, and 
the Junker, of the war for civilization and for the free- 
dom of the smaller nations, and other phrases of the 
sort in ideal guise, of infinite effect upon men who do not 
see too clearly. The public opinion of the world was 
within their power. For the American soldiers the 
war became, as it were, a crusade against us. 


"the public opinion of the world was within their power"



------


Where did he get the idea of jewish conspiracy?


https://books.google.com/books?id=bzUTCgAAQBAJ&pg=PA250&lpg=PA250&dq=%22The+supreme+government+of+the+Jewish+people%22+Ludendorff&source=bl&ots=5c2OgSn_6j&sig=LdAiYeOsEgI7S4ANHfMd5i2Zkss&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwjYroqWodXWAhXK3YMKHXtZAYsQ6AEINDAE#v=onepage&q=%22The%20supreme%20government%20of%20the%20Jewish%20people%22%20Ludendorff&f=false


says he blamed jews in "Kriegsfurung und Politik"


https://books.google.com/books?id=VTDtCwAAQBAJ&pg=PT99&lpg=PT99&dq=%22Warfare+and+politics%22+ludendorff&source=bl&ots=UGflR8nmTp&sig=Sz8CUzHVR7dAl0uVEuJzXsbJyvU&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwjIk7GBotXWAhWW8oMKHbqMDowQ6AEIJjAA#v=onepage&q=%22Warfare%20and%20politics%22%20ludendorff&f=false


Obsessed with Rathenau? Ludendorff decided he was a part of massive Jewish plot


his 1919 book seems like a lot of excuses, does blame Bolsheviks in a few passsages for undermining military and having a grip on world opinion, but nothing conspiritorial about jews, some passages come off as racist against jews, others as not completely racist


by 1922, his "warfare and politics" book is blaming a massive zionist conspiracy right out of the protocols


but this was at the height of his involvement with Aufbau--is that what gave him these ideas?


Ludendorff's involvement in WW1 comes off as him being used, suckered into helping Bolsheviks, especially securing passage of Lenin. So at some level in his head he might know that the spread of Bolshevism was his fault, and he got used. In 1919 he seems to be searching for others to blame and making excuses for himself, by 1922 it seems he found someone to blame in the jews. He blamed "the supreme government of the Jewish people who work hand and hand with france and england"



https://www.facinghistory.org/holocaust-and-human-behavior/chapter-4/myth-jewish-conspiracy
	In 1919, Erich Ludendorff, one of Germany’s top military leaders, announced that Jews were one of several groups responsible for the nation’s defeat. By 1922, he was focusing almost entirely on Jews as “the enemy.”


by 1919, already saying Jews were responsible for Germany's defeat, even more focused on Jews by 1922.

	He wrote, “The supreme government of the Jewish people was working hand in hand with France and England. Perhaps it was leading them both.”

	As proof, he cited the Protocols of the Elders of Zion, a document supposedly containing the minutes of a secret meeting of Jewish leaders—the so-called “Elders of Zion”—held at the turn of the twentieth century. At that supposed meeting, the “Elders” allegedly plotted to take over the world. 

	In fact, the Protocols is a forgery; Russian secret police wrote it in the early 1900s to incite hatred against Jews. At the time, few people paid much attention to the document, but after World War I, it became a worldwide sensation. Many believed that the Protocols explained seemingly “inexplicable” events—the war, the economic crises that followed the war, the revolutions in Russia and central Europe, even epidemics. Myths regarding a “Jewish conspiracy” had been around for centuries, but the Protocols gave them new life, even after the document was exposed as a hoax in 1921. For many people, the war and the earthshaking events that followed it confirmed the Protocols’ authenticity, no matter what evidence was offered to the contrary. 


So he believed protocols, which provided an "explanation" for events of WW1.


https://libres.uncg.edu/ir/asu/f/Vickers,%20William%20Spring%202015.pdf
	The Protocols certainly had a hand in this criticism. In his 1922 book A Critique of the Age, Rathenau made a statement that proved very easy to take out of context. “Three hundred men, all of whom know one another, guide the economic destinies of the Continent and seek their successors among their followers,” wrote Rathenau, a reference to the oligarchy that controlled finance and business. This context was completely altered by those who believed the message of the Protocols, however. General Ludendorff, one of Rathenau’s most vocal critics, led the charge with his claim that these “three hundred men” mentioned must be the titular Elders, and if Rathenau knew the precise number, he must be one of them.


Ludendorff a conspiratorial nutcase


	...Austria was not the only country Hitler distrusted.Hitler devoted many pages to the newly formed Soviet Union, decrying, “In Russian Bolshevism, we ought to recognize the kind of attempt which is being made by the Jew in the twentieth century to secure dominion over the world.” The Jewish desire for world domination became quite clear to Hitler with the fall of the Czar and the emergence ofLenin and theBolsheviks in the Russian Revolution of 1917. The connection between Lenin and Judaism was not one invented by Hitler; indeed, rumors about the familial history of the founder of the Soviet Union existed even before 1917. One of Hitler’s greatest influences, Dietrich Eckart, wrote an essay titled “Bolshevism from Moses to Lenin,” which attempted to show the connection.


Eckart spreading the "jewish bolshevism" theory


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Dietrich_Eckart
	Eckart met Adolf Hitler when Hitler gave a speech before the DAP members in 1919. Eckart was involved with the Thule Society, although not a member. The Society was a secretive group of occultists who believed in the coming of a “German Messiah” who would redeem Germany after its defeat in World War I.[9] Eckart expressed his anticipation in a poem he wrote months before he first met Hitler. In the poem, Eckart refers to ‘the Great One’, ‘the Nameless One’, ‘Whom all can sense but no one saw’. When Eckart met Hitler, Eckart was convinced that he had encountered the prophesied redeemer.[10] Eckart became Hitler's mentor, exchanging ideas with him and helping to establish theories and beliefs of the Party.


hmmm



------


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Max_Bauer
	Colonel Max Hermann Bauer (31 January 1869 – 6 May 1929) was a German artillery expert in the First World War who was also prominent in the army's political meddling. Later he was a military and industrial adviser to the Republic of China under Chiang Kai-shek.


this guy, advisor to Ludendorff is somewhat suspicious for also being advisor to Chiang Kai-shek.

	...He wrote about his experiences and national policy during the war.[17][18] In 1920 Bauer and Ludendorff were among the leaders of the right-wing Kapp Putsch, which seized control of the government. They were forced out by a nationwide general strike. Ludendorff was let off but Bauer had to flee the country. He worked as a military consultant in the Soviet Union, Spain and Argentina. He returned to Germany in 1925 following an amnesty for all those involved in the Putsch.


this is also sketchy


	...In 1928, Bauer returned to Germany to make contacts with German industries and the army. However, the Treaty of Versailles restricted arms production. In addition, he was persona non grata to the German government as he had participated in the Kapp Putsch. Nonetheless Bauer was able to establish a China trade department and to make contact with the secret German military mission in Nanking.

	When Bauer returned to China, he advocated formation of a small core army supported by many local militia forces. Chiang did not use these ideas, since the militias would have concentrated military power in local hands. However, Bauer did manage to have the Whampoa Military Academy moved from Canton to Nanking,[20] it became the Central Military Academy, and to staff it with German military advisers and instructors. He invited 20 German officers to China to work as instructors in military training and military intelligence. Officially, Bauer was Chiang's economic adviser and encouraged him to develop infrastructure.

	Max Bauer died in Shanghai, of smallpox, on 6 May 1929, perhaps intentionally infected by one of his Chinese enemies, as he was the only person infected with the contagious disease in the region where he contracted it. He was buried in China with military honors. His ashes were later returned to Germany and buried at Swinemünde on 5 August 1929.


ya that's weird


------


taylor:

	On March 15, one week after the start of the Petrograd rising—which despite the occasional violence of the clashes had cost only some 1500 lives—the Duma’s Emergency Committee transformed itself into a Provisional Government. Prince Lvov was named Premier, Milyukov, Foreign Minister, and Kerensky, Minister of Justice. The new government called on civil and military authorities throughout the nation to honor its decrees. One of the earliest to respond was the Czar’s first cousin, Grand Duke Cyril, who at the head of his Marine Guards marched to the Tauride Palace and pledged his allegiance.


This mean anything? Kiril an early backer of the provisional government apparently